The Country That Should Have Stayed Home: How the U.S. Managed to Avoid Responsibility for War Crimes in Vietnam

Catherine Adcock

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 103 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Andrew Carlson, History

This paper analyzes the United States’ involvement in the Vietnam War and the policies and actions that lead to the committing of war crimes. I approached this research by examining primary sources (for example, oral histories and videos of testimonies made by veterans, and Army records detailing court cases involving soldiers who either reported or were accused of committing war crimes) and secondary sources like Stanley Karnow’s survey of the Vietnam war, and Nick Turse’s book, "Kill Anything that Moves." I found that there were three main factors that caused the American soldiers to commit war crimes: the military strategy that was implemented, poor training, and the nature of the conflict of the Vietnam War itself increased the number of ethically compromised actions committed by the US Army. The purpose and contribution of this project aim to bring to light aspects of the Vietnam War that the mainstream history courses do not teach. 

Keep It Secret, Keep It Safe: An Exploration of Queer Experiences in the United States Military during World War II and the Vietnam War

Catherine Adcock

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 103 // 2:30 PM

Mentor: Melissah Pawlikowski, History

This paper analyzes the experience of LGBT+ people who served in the US Military during the Second World War and the Vietnam War. Through the examination of primary sources like oral histories and letters to loved ones, as well as courts martials and discharge papers, and secondary sources on the wars and American social and political history, I will produce a paper that will explore the Queer experience of being in the military during those specific eras. The purpose of this project and also its contribution to the field of History are one and the same: to shine a light on a corner of history that many ignore and few explore, but that is still a large part of the history of the wars and the American view on homosexuality as a whole. 


The Politics of President Trump’s Travel Ban

Sondos Alsaery

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Suzanne Marilley, Political Science & Economics

In early 2017, President Trump, in an effort to reduce terrorist threats, issued an executive order that banned entry into the United States of America for citizens of certain nations that happen to be predominately Islamic: Iran, Iraq, Libya, Somalia, Syria, and Yemen. After adjustments and challenges in the federal courts, the bans remain today not only for most of these countries (Iraq and Sudan were removed from the initial ban), but certain visas were recently banned for Chad, Eritrea, Nigeria, and Tanzania. My research investigates whether the effects of the bans, even if they appear to achieve what Trump administration wanted, have had negative effects such as engendering both decline in some economies as well as Islamophobia in the United States. The methodology I used is content analysis of studies on whether we can detect the emergence of a negative correlation between the addition of the bans and the subsequent incidence of terrorist acts in the United States compared to the incidence of terrorist threats before the bans were implemented. Although it is impossible to determine whether the bans deterred terrorist threats, I expect that my research will show that the negative effects of the bans outweigh the positive.

Direct Comparison of Genetic Ancestry DNA Testing Companies

Kristina Amos, Nate Vance

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Direct to consumer (DTC) genetic testing kits are becoming increasingly popular; as a result concerns about what results mean for consumers are showing up in the media. The purpose of this study was to evaluate DTC genetic testing kits to determine inter-test reliability. The companies of interest included Ancestry.com, 23andMe, and MyHeritage. Twenty-two participants, 12 females and 10 males representing a variety of ethnic groups, took the three independent DTC tests for ancestry lineage. Collection procedures specified by each company were used. Results for each participant were compared across companies, with similarities and discrepancies in identical categories being noted. Of the 22 participants in the study, 21 had a significant discrepancy in at least one category, and 8 had large discrepancies in two or more categories. For example, 23andMe reported 40.4% Native American ancestry for one participant while MyHeritage reported 4.2%. This creates an impression of unreliability, and may create complications for individuals who assume that the singular DTC test they used is an accurate portrayal of their ancestry, and therefore, their identity in one or more ethnic groups. Work needs to be done to ensure that consumer DNA reports are indeed accurate reflections of genetic ancestry.


Attitudes Towards Tailored Advertisements on Social Media

Tiffany Armentrout, Makaela O'Reilly, Cory Mangen, Taylor McCloud, Danielle Whitley

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

The infrastructure of the internet is built upon advertisements which make much of the internet free. While this financial reprieve for users offers technological opportunity for many, users are often unaware that they are being closely surveilled based on items they search and purchase. Targeted advertisements are developed by utilizing geographic information, demographics, presence on social media, and browsing behavior. This information produced the question: Are college students willing to relinquish their privacy to generate advertisements that would interest them? In an online questionnaire, Facebook/Instagram users (n=81) were asked demographic questions about their age, gender identity, socioeconomic class, and the hours spent on Facebook and Instagram. Five-item Likert-type scales were used to assess knowledge, feelings, and actions towards cyber security online. The survey also consisted of five vignettes that assessed participants’ comfort with and likelihood to click on ads they found either (1) interesting or (2) uninteresting. Results indicate that both comfort and interest in a targeted advertisement increase the likelihood to click. The findings contribute to modern research about the negative effects of online ads because they reveal that users are willing to exchange their internet privacy for targeted advertisements that align with their interests. 

 
Relationship Between Video Games and Personality Traits

Lexi Armstrong, Megan Miller, Kylie Grant

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

As video games become more prevalent in today’s society, their usage can impact behavior and personality. Previous research has emphasized the association between the amount of time spent playing video games and personality. However, there is a gap in literature on the classification of video game genres relating to personality. The current study investigated the relationship between video game usage and genre preferences to personality traits of openness, conscientiousness, extraversion, agreeableness, and neuroticism. Undergraduates completed an online survey using a modified version of the Gaming Preferences Questionnaire and the Big Five Inventory. We suspect that conscientiousness will be positively associated with strategy gamers, openness will be positively associated with adventure and role-playing gamers, and extraversion will be positively associated with sports gamers. It is also anticipated that agreeableness will be negatively associated with adventure and role-playing gamers, and neuroticism will be positively associated with strategy and action gamers. Finally, higher video game usage will show lower levels of extraversion, agreeableness, and openness, and will also show higher levels of neuroticism and conscientiousness. This research allows for further exploration of how video game genre and the amount of time spent playing correlates with personalities.


Importance of Rehabilitation

Kelly Bachmann, Brooklyn Keaton, Kat Lowe

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

The authors presented the importance of rehabilitation and the various aspects that make rehabilitation successful to high school student-athletes at West Jefferson and Zionsville Community high schools. At a high school setting that has access to athletic trainers, it is vital that students understand the importance of incorporating athletic trainers into their rehabilitation. Athletic trainers play a significant role in the athlete’s rehabilitation starting from the moment the injury occurs to returning to play. Athletic trainers are able to evaluate an injury and make the most appropriate decision in regards to referring to a physician and creating treatment plans. Once a rehabilitation plan is established, the athletic trainer will work closely with the athlete’s day-to-day progression while under the physician’s advisement. The goal of rehabilitation is to restore the athlete’s strength, range of motion, power, neuromuscular control, and skill that is required for their sport so that the athlete is prepared to return to play with minimal risks.


Posterior Elbow Dislocation Rehabilitation Protocol

Kelly Bachmann

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

The elbow is considered a stable hinge joint between the humerus and ulna. However, posterior elbow dislocations are the second most common type of dislocation. The mechanism of injury typically involves hyperextension of the elbow with an axial load. This type of injury is considerably debilitating and will remove an athlete from participation for a significant amount of time. Correct and aggressive rehabilitation is necessary to restore full function of an athlete’s upper extremity allowing safe return to play. Rehabilitation protocols containing early mobilization will increase a positive prognosis. Rehabilitation protocol is split into three phases to align with the inflammatory response so that the individual activities promote the most natural healing. Phase one of the protocol primarily consists of controlling an athlete’s pain and inflammation caused by the injury. Once controlled, the athlete can begin phase two. This includes restoring range of motion and beginning strengthening exercises. Finally, in phase three, the athlete will begin improving their functional and sport-specific movements. Successful rehabilitation will return the athlete to their sport quickly and safely. 


Social Media Conditioning

Natalie Barkes, Bailey Dozer, Tyler Howard

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Recent trends in technology have led to a society in which individuals are engaging with their phones concurrent with other tasks. Conditioning the mind to check social media is rising in prevalence as it is integrated into everyday life. People have trained themselves with the gratifying reward of checking their phones. Occasionally refreshing the feed conditions one to keep checking until something new appears. When this happens, the gratifying experience of utilizing social media reinforces the conditioning. This study looked into how people are conditioned to frequently check their phones throughout the day. Participants were asked to abstain from using social media for five days. A pre and post survey assessed their phone checking tendencies. We expect that while participants may report discomfort with disconnecting from social media initially, the removal of feedback from their devices will lead to an overall reduction in conditioned behaviors in the post test relative to the pre test. Results from this research could be used to inform development of healthier user interfaces that do not directly encourage conditioned responses from users. 


The Effects of Polychlorinated Biphenyls on Reproductive Health

Holly Barlage, Torie Cochran, Caroline Cramblit

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) are synthetic organic chemicals used in various industrial and commercial settings, including electrical equipment. Over many decades PCBs have found their way into the environment and have been shown to cause severe health defects in both animals and humans. Previous research indicates that PCBs have had adverse effects on the reproductive health of many organisms. This study is designed to examine correlations between PCBs and the reproductive health of women. The National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) is designed to assess the health and nutritional status of Americans. It combines interviews and physical examinations of millions of participants on a two year cycle, beginning in 1999. This study is utilizing the NHANES database to statistically analyze the PCB levels in human blood samples over twenty years and compare them to reproductive health of women, particularly menstrual patterns and rate of conception. This study will allow a further understanding of the impacts of PCBs on public health and help design further research. 

Assessing the Connection Between Obesity and Socioeconomic Factors, Diet, and Exercise

David Barnett, Nick Scharfenberger, Elijah Fulton.

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Obesity in American has become a nationwide epidemic. The three main underlying factors of obesity are ethnicity, education/income, and diet/exercise. Being overweight is medically defined as having a body mass index (BMI) of 25-29.9 kg/m^2, while being obese is medically defined as having a BMI of equal to or more than 30 kg/m^2. The purpose of this study is to identify the relationship of each contributing factor to changes in obesity rates. The National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) is designed to assess the health and nutritional status of Americans. It combines interviews and physical examinations of millions of participants into one database. This study is using the NHANES database to examine and the relationship between obesity and underlying factors. This is important because surveys show that 81% of Americans consider obesity to be the most serious health problem facing the nation. What we want to accomplish is to help bigger corporations, health influencers, etc. identify the groups of people who struggle with obesity. Also, to target them and to raise awareness in order to prevent not only obesity but the onset of other deadly diseases.

Pursuing Through the Bookcase of Latin American Literature and Emergent Literacy

Rebecca Blanton

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 126 // 2:30 PM

Mentors: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

One of the most important aspects in education for a student is the ability to see themselves in the classroom. Many strategies support and promote a classroom environment or setting that is inclusive and encourages learning for all students including: reading about student’s home cultures, family picture walls, family conversations, and most notably, multicultural literature (Gillet 2019). Multicultural literature can be beneficial for every student by introducing them to another culture in order to better understand their peers and the world around them. Most importantly, it is pertinent for the students’ cultures who are being reflected in said text. Due to the growing percentage of Latinx families in the United States, there is an increasing necessity for teachers to understand how to work with Latin American students that come to the classroom with different levels of emergent literacy. This paper explores the necessity of Latin American literature, inside the current American classroom. In order to analyze this phenomenon, this presentation employs Esperanza Rising as a cultural artifact that manifests identity transformation in order to provide a concrete example for appropriate classroom literature to exemplify multiculturalism. 

“Déjame que te hable:” Neruda’s Veinte poemas de amor y una canción desesperada in Translation and Its Effects

Carlin Briggs

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 212 // 2:00 PM

Mentors: Reg Dyck, English, Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

Although translation is necessary to educate about cultures and literatures of other interpretive communities, it is impossible to replicate the original text. Nevertheless, translators strive for relationships between the original source text and the translated target text, limiting language-based boundaries and leading to education through literary exposure. Using the translation of Neruda’s early poetry as an example, Americans quickly adopted Neruda’s earliest book of poetry, Veinte poemas de amor y una canción desesperada (Twenty Love Poems and a Song of Despair, 1924) into the literary canon. The rough and rushed translations from Spanish to English hindered the comprehension of Neruda’s poetry. By comparing two translators, W.S. Merwin and Robert Hass, their methods are debated on effectiveness. Through Hass’s interpretation of Neruda’s fifteenth poem, I review a successful translation, including coherent syntax and poetic rhyming. Contrastingly, I reflect on an unsuccessful translation, including Merwin’s awkward phrasing and unnecessary English methods. The main difference is Merwin’s literal translation and Hass’s poetic adaptation. I supply guidelines, such as cohesion and maintenance of the original meaning and tone, and caution when reviewing translations. Finally, I offer solutions to Hass’s translation of Neruda’s poem, particularly euphonious word choice and clearer literary devices. 


Is music education too tonal? The importance of incorporating nontonal music into the classroom

Janie Burwick

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 235 // 2:30 PM

Mentor: Dina Lentsner, Music

Music education scholarship evidences a strong dislike of nontonal music among students in secondary schools. However, according to Van Puyvelde (2014), while displaying preference for consonant music, three-month old infants did not respond negatively to dissonant music, supporting the idea that there is no aversion toward dissonance in human nature. This study examined the preference for consonance in Western cultures and discusses its effect on music education in the US. It is argued that incorporating nontonal/dissonant music at an earlier age could present young students with more future learning opportunities than with only consonant, tonal music. The National Core Art Standards serve as guidelines for American schools to create well-balanced, well-rounded music education experiences. However, these standards are explicitly based in tonal music. Although it is true that one’s toleration for atonal music decreases by adolescence, an earlier exposure to dissonance may curb this phenomenon. For example, piano method books by Bartók, Finney, and Kurtág introduce children to essential musical concepts through playing on and with the instrument, and using both consonant and dissonant music. It is maintained that intentional incorporation of nontonal/dissonant music into music curricula could potentially counteract societal expectations of tonality in music and create audiences willing to appreciate variance in music.


Sport Hernia Rehabilitation Protocol

Cameron Caldwell

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

The main point of my research paper is to generate and design a rehabilitation program for a sports hernia also known as athletic pubalgia. Sport hernias are common in athletes due to the many causes that sports hernias have. We should have a rehab protocol for our patients to fully recover from the surgery, if surgical treatments were applied, and to recover to activities of daily living and returning to play if they are athletes. Using concepts and data from different credible sources about the different treatment options for sports hernia and other important information, I will create a rehab protocol for an athlete who has undergone surgery and provide information about each week of rehab. Timeline for recovery depends on what type of treatment path was taken. Obviously, if one needs surgery to repair the abdomen the rehab timeline is going to take much longer than without surgery. Since this injury is in the abdomen area, a lot of the rehab is focused on core stabilization. The core is a basic necessity in most rehabs, but it is included throughout and focused on this specific rehab protocol.

Does purposeful hourly rounding help decrease falls on inpatient Medical- Surgical Units?

Megan Carpenter, Elizabeth Pfahler, Abigail Ross, Sierra Stant, Alivia Stover

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kathy Fernandez, Nursing

This research was conducted to explore the relationship between purposeful hourly rounding and fall rates among inpatient medical surgical floors. The purpose of this research was to prove that purposeful hourly rounding on medical surgical floor decreases the fall rates among patients. In order to conduct this research we used nursing databases, such as CINAHL. From this research we concluded, the implementation of purposeful hourly rounding, decreases falls on medical surgical unit. Our research contributes to the nursing discipline by decreasing falls, increasing patient safety, and overall reducing preventable cost for the healthcare system.

I’ve Got A Feeling: Comparing and Integrating Black Church Musicality and Traditional Music Therapy

Bree Chambers

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 212 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: E. Wray Bryant, Religion & Philosophy

The oral tradition of African Americans is, perhaps, one of the most distinct aspects of this culture. Most notably, music has stood the test of time and lasted through a history of trials and tribulations. However, systemic and individual traumas, challenges and disadvantages have created a precarious state of affairs for mental health within the black community. While expressive arts therapies are historically advantageous, cultural stigma and heightened importance of religion have led many African Americans to rely upon the institution of the black church to provide emotional and circumstantial solace. Bearing this in mind, this project’s purpose is to illustrate an argument for and application of how creative arts therapists can integrate into diverse demographics. Through literature review over four critical areas, 1) black mental health 2) music in the black church 3) music therapy, and 4) praxis, as well as interviews with a black mental health provider, connections emerge between traditional music therapy and utilization of music in the black church. With this information, creative arts therapists are equipped to recognize similarities and develop directives which can increase a client familiarity with psychological intervention and reduce apprehension and stigma.


Liberté, Égalité, Fraternité, Laïcité?: A Maghrebi Story

Riley Cochran

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 126 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

Maghreb immigrants in France have been facing discrimination and oppression since the massive influx of North Africans into France in the 20th century. Their struggle with assimilation into French society mirrors that of many persistent immigrant crises occurring elsewhere in the world. In this presentation, I will explore the challenges faced by Maghreb immigrants in France, their integration into French society and how the French concept of laïcité (French secularism) in the political climate, educational systems, and contemporary life has played a role. I will do so through analyzing laïcité, it’s original intent, and the challenges it has created in terms of identity, multiculturalism, and acceptance. I will also focus on how French political leaders and schools have reacted to Maghreb immigrants and the ways in which they have affected their integration. To further our comprehension of the integration of Maghreb immigrants, I will compare their experiences to those of certain European immigrant groups who have been settling in France for decades. Through understanding laïcité and the role of leadership, identity and education in integration, we can gain the ability to learn and develop solutions to aid in easing the immigration integration process for millions of immigrants throughout the world. 


Fraternity or Separate Ties: Integration of Latin Americans in Spain

Riley Cochran

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 126 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

Oftentimes we associate Latin American immigration with the United States. After all, the United States is one of the top receiving countries of Latin American immigrants. In reality, however, the United States is not the only country to receive massive influxes of Latin American immigrants. In the past several years, many Latin American immigrants have opted to move to Spain in search of a better life. Due to their shared language and culture, many people assume that this would allow them an easy and efficient transition and integration process. Despite this, many discover that they still feel like outsiders in the community. In this presentation, I will analyze the integration of Latin Americans in Spain by observing how diverse factors including the government, jobs, education and Spanish society affect the integration and wellbeing of these immigrants. To obtain a comprehensive understanding of how this case relates to other cases, I will also compare and contrast the experiences of Latin American immigrants in the United States and Brazilian immigrants in Portugal. Thus, we can learn more about what facilitates or impedes integration for comparable yet distinct populations. Are cultural, historical and linguistic ties enough to unite two populations?

Musical Effects on Individual Time Perception (Honors Capstone Project)

Nicole Coleman

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 07 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Time is thought of as the seconds on a clock, an invariant constant in which everyone is affected equally. However, one’s perception of time is often not a true depiction of “reality” and everyday events can influence this perception. Components of music (tempo, arousal, and one’s music preference and expertise) have demonstrated a significant effect on time estimation ability. Little research has investigated the effect of lyrics on this phenomenon. To assess these variables, participants completed a duration estimation task in four conditions—fast versus slow tempo, and lyrical versus instrumental—for both visual and auditory stimuli. On a given trial, the observer indicated by button press how long a previously presented stimulus had lasted. Ambient music for each condition was played synchronously with the task. A post-survey controls for participants’ musical expertise and familiarity with the music. Results are predicted to show both tempo and lyrics will cause perceptual shortening or lengthening of stimulus duration. These effects are expected to vary depending on whether the concurrent task is visual or auditory. This study could provide further insight into the relationships between music, time perception, and environmental stimuli, and could give ideal conditions for waiting and time-consuming situations. 

Effects of Presentation Styles and Personality Traits on Cyberbullying

Nicole Coleman

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Cyberbullying has become prevalent in today’s society as digital culture is incorporated into everyday life, leading to negative effects on victims’ mental health. In hope of abating the influence of cyberbullying, prior research has investigated possible contributing factors, including personality traits, and the roles of victim, bully, and bystander in online environments. However, it is unclear how the management of one’s self-image through malleable presentation styles influences each role. This study aimed to provide new insight on cyberbullying by investigating the connection between presentation styles and personality traits, as they interrelate with the roles of victim, bully, and bystander. A questionnaire assessed these variables by use of the five-factor model of personality, a classification of presentation style preference, and a cyberbullying experience assessment. An agent-based model investigated how the empirical findings from the survey influenced the amount of bullies, victims, and bystanders in a simulated social network. Survey analysis found both presentation styles and personality traits were associated with the roles. Model simulations suggest that bystanders play a particularly important role in online networks. Knowing presentation styles and personality traits are indicative of cyberbullying roles could promote the development of more specialized tactics to deter this harmful behavior. 


War on Drugs: The Effects of Mandatory Minimums on Clemency for Marijuana Convictions

Anna Dandridge-Testerman

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Robert Bennett, Social Work

The purpose of this project is to conduct a social policy analysis of Federal and state law regarding clemency for marijuana convictions. Marijuana is becoming increasingly legal, in various forms, across the United States. Public attitudes toward the drug have softened, resulting in policy change from decriminalization to recreational legalization. Still, the majority of those with a marijuana conviction will not receive retroactive relief. Mandatory minimums perpetuate racial disparities in sentencing, resulting in additional need for clemency. Federal and state policy related to marijuana and clemency were deconstructed using the Gilbert and Terrell (2009) and the Bowen and Murshid (2016) Trauma-Informed frameworks. Secondary literature was used to evaluate efficacy of Federal and state policy. Findings are expected to suggest that implementation of anti-drug policy was intended to deter drug abuse and target high-level drug traffickers, but the policies have failed. Findings are further expected to show that Federal and state policies disproportionately harm communities of color. This work is expected to contribute to macro-level social justice by providing an evidence-based policy recommendation aligned with the National Association of Social Workers’ ethical standards.

Immigration in the United States: An Examination of Cultural Bias and Institutionalized Obstruction

Liza Day

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 126 // 3:00 PM

Mentor: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

The United States boasts ample opportunities for its citizens; by working hard and being a good person, an individual can and will achieve the "American Dream." Unfortunately, for Latinx immigrants, this goal has become more and more impossible to reach, as immigrants face two enormous challenges upon deciding to enter the United States. The first test of the individual is whether or not they receive a legal citizenship status, which is more difficult for non-white immigrants. The second task of the individual is dealing with the racism and bigotry interwoven in American society. President Donald Trump is quick to call attention to the citizenship debate, and as a result has led efforts to tighten immigration policy and actively encourages anti-immigrant discourse. As a result, immigrants face a higher level of discrimination in the United States than the "American Dream" might imply. This paper examines the challenges of immigration to the U.S., and will show the higher level of difficulty that Latinx immigrants face both in the legal system and in society by comparing U.S. immigration policy, experiences of immigrants, and social media. This multifaceted approach will give a more thorough understanding of immigrant experiences.

Detection of a Pathogen (Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis) Impacting Amphibians Using Real-time PCR and DNA Sequencing

Sydney Dion

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 218 // 3:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

A newly emerged pathogen, Batrachochytrium dendrobatidis (Bd), affects 700 species of amphibians worldwide. Chytrid fungus enters through the pores in the amphibian’s skin and targets the keratin in their bodies, often leading to death. The disease’s impact is dependent on the species infected, the strain of Bd, and environmental factors. Comparative population genomics have been used to identify divergent lineages of Bd, one of these being BdGPL, which was identified as hypervirulent. The purpose of this experiment was to sequence the hypervirulent strain using DNA barcoding, construct leaf-litter bags to assess salamander biodiversity, compare success rates of different sized live-traps, and to test for the presence of Bd using real-time PCR. The results showed that 13 sequences were confirmed to be 99% identical to Bd, as well as 100% identical to each other. Also, no correlation was found between live-trap size and trapping success rate, and leaf-litter bags caught one salamander larvae. Real-time PCR results showed that the samples were positive for Bd and negative for Bsal. Future research includes working with other authors to identify more regions of Bd to sequence the hypervirulent strain and to develop strategies to minimize the impact of chytrid and other environmental factors.


CUTransform: Dragging Capital University Faculty into the 21st Century

Megan Douglas, Willow Cox, Allison Huss, Samerrah Phillips, Hanna Pinkelman

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Andrea M. Karkowski, Psychology, Deanna Wagner, Student Development, Jody S. Fournier, Psychology

Capital University’s Digital Initiative, CUTransform, is a way to increase accessibility of college to students through the use of iPads. Students in pilot first-year Signature Learning classes and their faculty received iPads to test how the devices can facilitate learning. Faculty that were teaching the pilot courses were interviewed. In addition, a campus wide survey was sent out to all faculty to gain a better understanding on their views of technology, specifically in the classroom. The interviews revealed that most faculty had experiences using technology and were excited to use the iPad in their class. They also claimed that they had limited training with the iPad and how to implement it into their classroom. Overall, the faculty reported that the use of technology allowed for more active and visual learning of the students in the Signature Learning courses. Survey results indicated that faculty experience with technology predicted the use of technology in the classroom and faculty were concerned about receiving training prior to using the iPads in the classroom. These results, and the implementation of the Digital Initiative, will change the way that faculty view the use of technology in teaching and learning. 

Anxiety Disorders and Autoimmune Disease: Caregiver Awareness and Treatment Plans

Megan Douglas

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 105 // 3:30 PM

Mentor: Kevin Lucas, Political Science

Recent research in the field of psychoneuroimmunology demonstrates the existence of a causal link between childhood anxiety disorders and the development of autoimmune disorders. This project examines (1) the extent to which psychologists, psychiatrists, and counselors who work with patients who suffer from anxiety disorders are aware of the role that anxiety plays in triggering autoimmune disease biomarkers and (2) the ways that these caregivers may alter a patient’s treatment if they become aware that the patient has an autoimmune disease biomarker or if autoimmune diseases run in the patient’s family. Findings of this research is that there needs to be more awareness of the connection of anxiety and autoimmune disorders. This is important because autoimmune disease prevalence is on the rise and health care professionals should be doing everything in their power to reduce the occurrence of autoimmune diseases. 

Witchcraft in Words: Poetry Inspired by the Mother of Modern Witchcraft

Sydney Dudley

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 212 // 2:30 PM

Mentors: Kevin Griffith, English

My research delves into the witchcraft and Wiccan movement that occurred in Britain in the 1960s and one of the most influential figures of the movement, Doreen Valiente. The purpose of my research was to create a chapbook of twenty poems which would aim to promote interfaith relations and challenge stereotypes surrounding the Wiccan faith and practice of Witchcraft. To accomplish this purpose, I studied the culture of the sixties, asking two specific questions: what was it that made this time the perfect environment for the rise of witchcraft and Wicca, and why was Doreen Valiente such an important person to the movement? I recorded my findings through poetry, findings of the tumultuous nature of the war and drug-riddled sixties and the strength and individuality of Doreen Valiente. My work benefits both the religious and English disciplines in that it works to break down religious prejudice and to use poetry to record history. 

Heavy Metal Binding Capabilities in Riboflavin Binding Protein (Honors Capstone Project)

Nicholas Ehrenborg, N/A

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Tracey Murray, Chemistry & Biochemistry

The focus of this work is the study of metal ion binding to riboflavin binding protein (RBP). RBP is a well-studied, stable protein purified from chicken eggs. Smith, et. al. showed in 2006 that RBP binds to copper (II) and has a large region of negatively charged phosphates. Other metal ions, such as heavy metals like lead, could be binding to RBP. Dephosphorylating this protein allowed us to determine whether the metal ions are binding to the negatively charged phosphate groups, or in the metal-binding site. UV-Vis spectrophotometry and atomic absorption spectrophotometry were used to determine the concentration of metal that is bound to the protein. RBP has a similar role in both chickens and humans. We found that lead does bind to chicken RBP, thus there is potential that a similar process could be happening in humans. This is relevant to situations like the Flint water crisis, where drinking water had a higher content of lead than is deemed acceptable. By looking at the binding capabilities of heavy metals, one could apply the research to metal poisoning in humans. 

Could Vitamin C Be Used to Cure Depression?

Madyson Fagan, Leticia Vargus

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Depression is a well-known mental disorder caused by a neurochemical imbalance and improper functioning of neurotransmitters whose main function is to communicate between cells. Depression may affect moods, eating behaviors, activities, and overall health. In recent years, there has been an increase in the population of those diagnosed with depression. There are many antidepressants that help treat depression but many of them have significant side effects. New treatment methods are constantly being discovered. For example, vitamin C helps neurotransmitters run more efficiently which could decrease depression symptoms. If this is true, vitamin C could be an alternative which could improve mood without the unwanted side effects. In this study, the relationship between vitamin C deficiency and depression in people between the ages of 16-22 is being studied by using the National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) database, which was designed to explore the health and nutritional status of Americans. The investigators are using this tool to look at the number of individuals diagnosed with depression and comparing it to those who normally consume vitamin C. These results may contribute important knowledge of finding other alternatives to prescribed antidepressant medications.

Keeping Families Close: PR Immersion class creates campaign for new Ronald McDonald Family Room as part of groundbreaking Behavioral Health facility in Columbus

Zach Ferenchak, Kate Patsiavos, Kathryn Pease, Tronston Williams

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Lois Foreman-Wernet, Media

Mental and Behavioral Health issues are on the rise with today’s youth, as 11% of children ages eight to eleven and 22% of teens ages thirteen to eighteen have a mental illness. To address these issues, Nationwide Children’s Hospital opened a first-of-its-kind pediatric Behavioral Health facility on March 1, 2020. Featured in the brand-new Big Lots Behavioral Health Pavilion at Nationwide Children’s Hospital is a first of its kind Ronald McDonald Family Room. To help spread the word about this opening, Ronald McDonald House Charities of Central Ohio (RMHC) enlisted the help of a group of talented Capital University students. In collaboration with Fahlgren Mortine, an award-winning integrated marketing communications agency, the group of students designed a multi-faceted campaign to meet the communications goals of its client. The class divided into three teams: Media Relations, Social Media, and Video. The teams each created content to be used by RMHC in their campaign surrounding the Family Room. As part of this collaborative immersion experience, all three groups worked closely alongside partners at Fahlgren Mortine to ensure quality of the final products. The project concludes with a presentation to the client and handoff of materials to be used at the client’s will.

Hearing Impairments: Psychological Effects on Communication Styles

Tyler Ferguson

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 103 // 3:00 PM

Mentor: Sharon Croft, Communication

There are many challenges faced by individuals with hearing impairments. One distinct challenge for someone with a hearing impairment is communication with someone who does not have a hearing impairment. For my capstone project, I examined interpersonal concerns experienced by individuals with hearing impairments. To understand better these concerns, I conducted a literature review in my two areas of study: psychology and communication. Specifically, I found three communication theories—face negotiation (Ting-Toomey, 1985), expectancy violations (Burgoon, 1988), and communication accommodation (1991)—and four psychological studies (Chang et al., 2016; Gosselin et al., 2019; Goossens et al., 2019; Millen et al., 2019; Suzuki et al., 2004) that helped me understand how differences in hearing affect interpersonal interactions. Through my research, I gained insights into the negotiations made by those with hearing impairments. In particular, I discovered how communication accommodation, unless adopted by both individuals, has limited benefits. Additionally, through my research, I saw how the scholarly work in fields of communication and psychology complement and inform each other. 

Charles Ives and His Inspiration (Honors Capstone Project)

Elizabeth Festi

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 07 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Joshua Borths, Music

The research project that I pursued focuses on American composer Charles Ives. I analyzed how the relationship with his father set Charles Ives on his path towards his notably idiosyncratic style of music arranging and composition. The effects of this relationship were further investigated through three sections of his life: his childhood, time at Yale and shortly after, and his retirement from the life insurance business until his death. Ives was an innovator in nontraditional music and to many ears can sound unpleasant, but nonetheless he created music of intense interest and experimented with many techniques composers had not used before. Through this analysis, I intend to show examples of how he was the prototype of the 20th century musician since Ives was one of the first musicians/composers to make a living from more than just music. Ives was a successful insurance salesman and was able to support his own creativity because of it. He was able to compose what he wanted because he didn’t depend on commissions from others with different tastes for a living. This research will culminate in a lecture recital in the spring of 2020 and feature original analysis of select work by Ives.


The Effects of Social Media Use on JOMO

Taylor Fleming, Claire Weisbrod, Olivia Jones, Cheyney Brown

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

FOMO the Fear of Missing Out refers to the unhealthy behaviors driven by this particular fear that social media usage can create. On the flipside, JOMO the Joy of Missing Out refers to an improvement in social media habits resulting in fewer of the unhealthy side effects commonly associated with FOMO. Recent research has found that JOMO has numerous benefits. For example, duration/quality of sleep, quality of interpersonal relationships, and the ability to remain productive in the face of social media usage all increase in incidence. The present study sought to better understand the connection between FOMO and JOMO in social media users. An online survey assessed participants’ daily social media usage in relation to higher quality of life reporting. Findings indicated that an increased use of social media was detrimental to productivity levels and the maintenance of interpersonal relationships. By contrast, a decrease in social media use benefitted participants for all of the researched quality of life items. The implications of these findings may sway individuals to decrease their social media use as they are linked to healthy social media habits and respondents who report satisfactory quality of life. 


Ophicleide Fantastique? Berlioz's "Symphonie Fantastique" and the Low Brass Instrumentation Controversy

Devin Foster

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 235 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Dina Lentsner, Music

Hector Berlioz’s Symphonie Fantastique was one of the first multi-movement compositions signaling Romantic era’s “transposition” of the symphonic genre into the realm of program music. I examine a controversy surrounding low brass instrumentation in the Dies Irae funeral chant in Mvt. 5 of the work, arguing the later modified two-tuba version is a better fit for the contemporary orchestra. While the Dies Irae section is typically played by two tubas and four bassoons, in his original 1830 score, Berlioz used period instruments, serpent and ophicleide, and later had switched instrumentation from two ophicleides to two tubas (Wotton, 1915). Some scholars, including Ahrens (1996) and MacDonald (2003) advocate for authenticity in contemporary performance practice, maintaining the parts were written in a register where the ophicleide would provide a better match to the bassoon’s timbre. However, their opponents believe the piece is more effective in terms of tuning and sound quality in modern two-tuba instrumentation. I argue that, unless the entire orchestra instrumentation changed to period instruments for an authentic performance experience, the use of the ophicleide and serpent today would be ineffective. The modern tuba provides contemporary symphony orchestras and Berlioz’sSymphonie Fantastique with a fitting alternative to obsolete brass instruments.

Advocacy Project - Concussions

Daniel Franckhauser, Mitchell Machock, Cameron Caldwell

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

In this advocacy project, the group informed high school student-athletes who participate in contact sports about the prevalence of concussions in athletics. Contact sports have the highest incidence rate of concussions compared to other sports in the high school setting, resulting in athletes being put at a higher risk for concussions. As a result, these athletes should be informed on how to recognize and treat concussions. The presentation presented statistics on concussions in high school sports, and informed students of the long-term risks involved with concussions. The group utilized a PowerPoint Presentation and brochure hand-out to teach the student-athletes about concussions. The goal of the project is to promote awareness for and educate student-athletes about concussion safety, as well as promote discussion among parents and friends about concussion safety. These mediums will address factors involved with concussions including signs and symptoms, statistics, effects on the brain, and how to manage and treat them in an athletic training setting. The presentation also discussed the statistics on concussions in high school sports and demonstrated patterns behind occurrence rates. 

Extraction and Analysis of Caffeine in Various Tea Brands

Molly Frey, Matthew Tyler

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nyenty Arrey, Chemistry

Many people across the world consume caffeine daily from tea. Caffeine is described as a cardiac, respiratory, and psychic stimulant, as well as a diuretic. The goals of this study were to analyze caffeine amounts in tea from different countries via extraction, to compare the amounts of caffeine in each brand to see if they vary, and to compare these amounts to those seen in different brands of coffee to see which has more caffeine. Specifically, the amount of caffeine in an average two cup serving of tea was analyzed for this study. Average caffeine amounts varying between 0.242 grams and 0.332 grams were observed in the different brands of tea analyzed. When compared to the amounts of caffeine in six brands of coffee, it was observed that the tea exhibited greater amounts of caffeine than the coffee brands. This caffeine was analyzed using FT-IR and H-NMR spectral analyses and its identity was confirmed. With the role that tea plays in the lives of many individuals, the findings from this study will help in understanding the number of cups of tea that will be beneficial and which option, between tea and coffee, is better for one’s health and teeth.

Effects of Nurse Burnout on Patient Safety

Malori Galleher, Haven Wallace, Ksana Pushi, Alex Lowry

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicole Poellet, Andrea Whitcraft, Nursing

Medical errors are the third leading cause of death in the United States. In one year 35,416,020 hospitalizations occurred; 251,454 of these resulted in death by medical error. The purpose of this search of the literature was to explore the relationship between patient safety and nurses experiencing burnout and factors that contribute to burnout like communication, fatigue, and large patient to staff ratios. For this literature review, we searched several scholarly databases including CINAHL, Medline, and PubMed. We filtered our search using limiting criteria of English-only text and a publishing date range of 1999-2019. Our keyword search included the terms “nurse burnout” and “patient safety”. The result of our search yielded ten articles that examined the impact of burnout on patient outcomes. Of these, all ten demonstrated a negative correlation between patient outcomes and nurse burnout. This indicates that nurse burnout is a potential contributor to poor patient outcomes. Future work should explore effective solutions to reduce nurse burnout 

The Use of Thermal Imaging to Measure Radiant Heat Loss in Long Distance Runners and Age-Match Controls

Riley Hagy

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kimberly Heym, Biological & Environmental Sciences

During exercise, heat production increases resulting in an increased core body temperature. In order for the body to maintain a constant temperature, heat is dissipated when core temperature rises above a set-point. Thermography can be used to measure radiant heat loss following exercise and depicts the distribution of skin surface temperatures covering working muscles. A thermal infrared camera was used to evaluate temperature changes in the torso and legs of collegiate long-distance runners (n=3) and age-matched controls (n=5) before and after running an indoor 8-minute mile. When human core body temperature increases, the body attempts to rid itself of the excess heat through vasodilation of skin surface blood vessels leading to a decrease in skin surface temperature. The control group demonstrated this cooling pattern as their torso temperatures dropped an average of 6.2°F compared to a decrease of 3.2°F in the long- distance runners. Control subjects also experienced a larger drop in leg surface temperature (inside leg = 4.2°F, outside leg 3.6°F) than the long-distance runners (inside leg 0.3°F, outside leg 0.3°F). Thermal imaging is a non-invasive tool used to evaluate the degree and patterns of heat loss following exercise and may be useful in evaluating a runner’s fitness level.


If It Ain’t Baroque, Then Don’t Fix It: Why Studying Baroque Improvisation Can Help Jazz Musicians.

Austin Hamilton

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 235 // 3:30 PM

Mentors: Dina Lentsner, Music

Improvisation is one of the most fundamental elements of both jazz and baroque music. While the connection between these two distant musical styles has been extensively explored in music scholarship, there are few opportunities to study the art of baroque improvisation institutionally compared to jazz improvisation. This study argues for the importance of learning baroque improvisation techniques by jazz musicians of all levels to aid the development of their own improvisation skills. Some of the greatest baroque musicians, such as Dietrich Buxtehude and Johann Sebastian Bach, would improvise entire pieces on organ, demonstrating the importance of this skill. Baroque music uses harmonic improvisation through figured bass, as well as melodic ornamentation and strophic variations. Jazz employs similar strategies, utilizing lead sheets for rhythm sections, harmonically and rhythmically varied melodic material, and solo sections over the form of a piece. Thus, jazz and baroque improvisation use similar techniques but different vocabulary. Both baroque and jazz are preserved historical musical styles sharing a common essential element -- improvisation. This study advocates for the inclusion of an in-depth baroque improvisation study into existing jazz programs to enrich and further develop the art of improvisation. 


DNA Barcoding of Salamander species at Primmer Outdoor Learning Center to Improve Biodiversity and Promote Conservation

Kennedy Harden, Jordan Swilley

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

DNA barcoding is a widely used method of identifying species via comparison to other database sequences. DNA barcoding is commonly paired with field work to study biodiversity, a well-known way to assess the health and composition of a habitat based on the number of different species. Salamanders are a main organism of study due to their sensitivity to changes in habitat quality, since they are typically found in healthier habitats and studied as indicators. Primmer Outdoor Learning Center, located in Logan, Ohio is home to seven ecosystems including a groundwater stream system where salamander samples were collected. At Primmer, the most common species found were Southern Two-Lined (Eurycea cirrigera) and Northern Dusky (Desmognathus fuscus). Specific loci Cyt B and 16S were amplified in PCR, Zymo-cleaned, visualized on 3% agarose gel then sent to a genomics lab for sequencing. After the BLAST in GenBank using CodonCode, nine of the fourteen samples had at least an 80% similarity to a GenBank sequence. However, only one of the fourteen samples was correctly identified at 16S and matched the previous field identification. This research could aid in the identification of salamander species found at Primmer and promote effective conservation efforts.


Microphone Preamplifier - Electrical Build

Andrew Harmon

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 235 // 3:00 PM

Mentor: Neal Schmitt, Music

Over the Spring semester of 2020, I am learning what goes into designing and building microphone preamplifiers. I have chosen this project because microphone preamplifiers are required for nearly every microphone, and it is important to know how ones tools work. The learning curve on this subject is very steep as the vast majority of the resources published on electronic design assume a knowledge and understanding of basic electrical engineering principles. This curve was eased for me by the fact that I have access to experts with the knowledge required to point me in the right direction and to help me when I hit road blocks. Through these individuals and research online I have been able to come up with a workable schematic and I am currently in the stage of building my design. Through this project I have learned to break down design problems and have learned about some electrical principles that make audio engineering possible. I will leave my research and design on my personal website so that other engineers can build a similar product to mine without needing access to the resources that I have. When finished, I expect to have a clean/professional sounding microphone preamplifier.

Hunger Close to Home: An Examination of Cap Cupboard Visitor Data and Food Insecurity on Capital University's Campus

Kaitlynn Harrell

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 105 // 3:00 PM

Mentor: Abbey Rutschilling, Social Work

More than 40 percent of U.S. households are considered food insecure, meaning they do not have access to consistent or quality food supply. College students are no exception, as it is estimated that between 30 and 50 percent of college students are unable to afford or access the food that they need. In an effort to meet the needs of students, Capital University created the Cap Cupboard, an on-campus resource center available to all students. The Cap Cupboard provides a wide array of resources including food, clothing, and hygiene items. After utilizing the Cap Cupboard, students are asked to complete a survey regarding their experiences with the Cap Cupboard and food insecurity. Using the survey responses, the researcher examines the population of Cap Cupboard users by looking at demographic information such as race, gender, housing status, and their self-identified level of food security. Furthermore, the researcher evaluates the data to determine the limitations of the Cap Cupboard and present solutions to improve both student life on campus and increase student access to crucial resources. By conducting this research and suggesting service amendments, the Cap Cupboard and its staff can be better informed on connecting with students in need. 
Executive Order 13089: What Is The Government Doing To Protect Our Coral Reefs?

Nichole Hayes

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Suzanne Marilley, Political Science & Economics

Climate change is on the rise and at the forefront of political debate, but what is our government doing to protect the most sensitive and critical environment, coral reefs? My goal was to analyze government legislation, military action, and nonprofit organizations that focus on coral reef protection to determine what progress is being made and where they are falling short. I began by analyzing Executive Order 13089 and other government documents looking for gaps in regulations or protection. I then reviewed nonprofit organizations to see whether they were supported by government agencies or finances. I collected and organized my information to see how much the government is doing to protect the reefs and where there are shortcomings. I expect that the regulations will be fairly lenient especially in respect to carbon dioxide pollution. My findings will inform the public and researchers on what political actions are positively impacting the environment and what still needs to be done. 


Exploring Nursing Level Barriers For Implementation To Utilization of EBP (Graduate Research Forum)

Christine Heckler, Kim Gullick

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Breana Taylor, Nursing

Evidence based practice (EBP) is used to establish concrete clinical decisions to promote optimal patient outcomes. The purpose of this study is to explore the nurse level barriers for the use of EBP in rural hospitals. Rural hospitals often lack the financial resources and management support to engage in EBP projects. These smaller hospitals are often not associated with academic or research-based institutions. Fifteen articles were selected and reviewed from PsycINFO, PubMed, ProQuest, and CINHAL. Key terms selected included: 'rural hospital,' 'community hospital,' 'evidence-based practice,' 'nursing,' 'cost,' and 'implementation of evidence-based practice.' Expected findings: the increase in knowledge and attitudes regarding the acceptance of EBP among nurses is an association with utilization of EBP in rural settings. Using up-to-date research can improve a patient's quality of life, render optimal clinical outcomes, and reduce financial operating costs. Realizing the need to have an underlying knowledge and awareness of barriers to implementation, education regarding EBP must be adopted and encouraged by all levels of nursing. 


The Refugee Crisis: A Comparative Analysis of European Union Member State Responses

Kia Hemphill

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 212 // 3:00 PM

Mentors: Kevin Lucas, Political Science & Economics

Europe has been dealing with what has been labeled as a refugee crisis since 2015. The most popular entry points into Europe for refugees belong to European Union member states (Adams 2019). Because of this, many members of the European Union have been struggling with refugee intake and integration. Some states are notoriously more open to receiving refugees than others; however almost every state has seen at least a slight drop in popular support for the intake of refugees (Bauböck 2018). This research project seeks to explore and compare the attitudes and related policies towards refugees in Germany, Italy, Greece, and Hungary. These states all host varying quantities of refugees within their states as a result of their geographical locations and willingness to accept refugees. Based on an examination of each state’s level of homogeneity and quality of life, I hypothesize that member states of the European Union are more likely to be accepting towards refugees if the state has a high quality of living and a more diverse population. Having greater insight into state motivations surrounding refugee intake could aid the general international community in effectively and proactively navigating the difficulties that arise from large influxes of asylum seekers. 

Black Women: Intersectional Victims

Sienna Hill

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 105 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Laura Kane, Sociology & Criminology

The concept of intersectionality is a key operating principle behind many social and political movements. It is important to understand not only what intersectionality is, but how intersectional identities impact the day to day lives of those living with them. This paper explores the concept of intersectionality through the lens of the victimization of black women by the state and police. The purpose of this paper was to shed light on an area of criminology that was lacking in the current research. The victimization of black men by police is something that is widely talked about, but the similar experience of black women is not. Through my review of the literature and the critical analysis of those sources I found that not only are black women victimized by police, but they are victimized in similar ways to their male counterparts. As previously stated, this is an area of criminology that is not broadly researched or discussed in the field. This paper proposes new ideas on the topic and an adjustment to an existing theory to better explain this phenomenon. 


The Connection Between Social Media, Crime, and Racial Biases

Jenna Hoffmann, Samantha Montanez, Ashley Ward, Hunter Weidner

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Current research suggests that crime portrayal on social media affects racial bias in users, increasing dissonance among users in both online and in-person encounters. The purpose of this research was to examine the relationship between time spent on social media, exposure to crime on these sites, and the racial bias of undergraduate students. Participants (n=77) self-enrolled in the study, and information regarding social media usage habits, demographics, exposure to crime news, and perspectives on racial bias were measured using both online and in-classroom surveys. Analyses focused on the relationship between exposure to crime and racial bias, how online algorithms influence the news broadcast on social media, as well as how these interactions differ between social science and non-social science majors. Findings showed a positive correlation between racial bias and exposure to crime on social media. It was also found that online algorithms influence how news is broadcast online and that social science majors remain more neutral in their biases as compared to non-social science majors. These findings are important as they help illustrate why perceptions of crime and racial bias are at all-time highs, despite trending downwards.


 
Effect of Diet Composition and Temperature on Growth and Metamorphosis of American Bullfrog (Lithobates catesbeianus)

CJ Hughes, Stefanie Mazzeo

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Amphibians are regarded as particularly sensitive to declining habitat conditions. Factors including diet and temperature are flagged to have strong impacts on the growth and success of frog species. Understanding the contributing factors of species success is significant, particularly for the American Bullfrog (Lithobates catesbeianus), due to its detrimental impact on non-native ecosystems as an invasive species. This study monitored the rates of tail absorption and mass change of American Bullfrog tadpoles. Tadpoles were housed in four separate tanks: two tanks at 25 °C and two at room temperature. Tadpoles from one tank of each temperature set were fed a high-protein diet, while those in the other received a low-protein diet. One-Way ANOVA tests were run to compare data. The first compared tadpole masses, yielding an f-ratio value of 1.46392 (P= 0.256019). The second compared tail length, yielding an f-ratio value of 0.04539 (P= 0.986676). There were no observable differences in growth between the treatment groups. Overall trends could aid in predicting changing climate, specifically at the Willow Pond Wetland located in Logan, Ohio. While there is limited control over the changes bullfrog habitats could face, this information could aid in reducing the risk of population decline

CUTransform: Improving Student Access, Engagement, and Learning

Allison Huss, Samerrah Phillips, Willow Cox, Megan Douglas, Hanna Pinkelman

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Andrea M. Karkowski, Deanna Wagner, Jody S. Fournier, Psychology

As part of Capital University’s Digital Initiative, CUTransform, we collected baseline data about student experiences with, attitudes about, and comfort with digital technology, particularly how digital technology relates to learning. The purpose of this study was to measure both positives and negatives of the pilot study and provide solutions to improve the initiative. We administered a survey designed to assess students’ use of mobile devices and comfort with technology. We also conducted focus groups with first year students enrolled in the Digital Initiative pilot classes. The survey results indicated that first year students are more likely to use mobile devices in their learning than older students; however, students in the pilot classes and students not in the pilot classes were not different in their use of mobile devices for learning. Focus group results indicated using the iPads in the classroom could be improved by better training on their use. Students also reported that classroom tasks are now more convenient because all materials were on one device. These results will be used to improve the digital initiative on campus, making learning more accessible, affordable and promote overall student engagement and learning. 


Trends in Menarcheal and Menopausal Ages in the United States

Kati Jackson, Taylor Perkins, Cassie VanDyke

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

The initial and final occurrence of menses in a woman’s life can be indicative of future health. It can also illustrate how societal variables influence natural biological processes within the body. Clinically, the onset of menstruation is known as menarche, while cessation of menstruation is referred to as menopause. The timing of these reproductive milestones can be influenced by various genetic, environmental, nutritional, and socioeconomic factors. The aim of this correlation study was to find and review possible trends in the ages at which menarche and menopause occur in the United States. The National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) database uses interviews and physical examinations of millions of participants to analyze the health of Americans. Data have been collected in two-year cycles from 1999-2016. Relevant data are being extracted from NHANES and organized to illustrate how overall averages in age at menarche and menopause have evolved. It is expected that NHANES data will support the historically studied trend of decreasing age at menarche and increasing age at menopause, and may assist in establishing a clearer trend, as previous data have been contradictory. The health implications of a nationally changing reproductive timeline need to be further studied.

Live Video Sessions: Bloom Bright TV

Cory Jennings

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Neal Schmitt, Music

With the growth of the internet anyone can now make music content and post it online. This is a beautiful thing because it adds to the music community but at the same time ease of access introduces a lot of low quality material. Bloom Bright TV’s goal is to create live sessions that will help grow the music industry, inspire others, and flourish the artists they work with. I started this production by creating this vintage aesthetic in my head. I then brought it to life through preproduction, scheduling bands, project management, audio engineering, set designing, video production, and more. Bloom Bright TV consists of live studio sessions that connect fans closer to artists while offering an opportunity for artists to perform their music in a new way. I built a team of people with similar visions to help bring my production to life. I strive to create meaning in my work and want to release material that will influence others. We will achieve this through a close up vintage atmosphere that has not been done by anyone else. Bloom Bright TV’s content will be hosted on its website and social media platforms.

Dear Miss Conrad: Capital University in WWII

Ronald Jorgenson, Mary Clare Kunkel

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 102 // 2:30 PM

Mentors: Betsy Pike, Andrew Carlson, Film & Media Production

As part of the fall FMP Immersion course, we created a short documentary about the state of Capital University during the Second World War. The purpose of the project was to uncover the history of Capital during a time that was tainted by fear and triumph all over the world. The makeup of the team was half film and media majors and half history majors tasked with sorting through archival data, digitizing that data, and producing and filming a story suitable for an audience. The research process uncovered three main characters during the 1930’ and 40’s that helped shape Capital’s academic and social landscape. The project also wrestled with the intricate history of a German Lutheran university in the midst of a highly Jewish community. President Otto Mees shaped the modern idea of liberal arts and general education, alumnus Karl Hertz evacuated the cruelest of Nazi work camps, and Librarian Dorthea Conrad remained a beacon of hope and knowledge for those at home and abroad. This project sheds light on an area overlooked in the past and gives students, alumni, and the general public a creative way to look into the history of our renowned university. 
 
Scaphoid Repair and Rehabilitation

Brooklyn Keaton

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Fractures of the scaphoid are quite common, in fact, research suggests that they are the most commonly fractured carpal bone. Often times scaphoid fractures occur when someone falls onto an outstretched hand (FOOSH) resulting into forceful hyperextension of the wrist leading to the scaphoid hitting the radius. There are several treatment options for scaphoid fractures and often times, though left up to the Physician, the approach is through surgery. There are a variety of surgery options based on the placement of the fracture and several other factors. The type of surgical treatment is also up to the Surgeon’s discretion. The goals of surgical treatment are to allow for bony union, fix any deformities, prevent instability within the wrist and limit arthritis involvement. The following article will discuss the anatomy involved, the surgical process, and the rehabilitation phases for patients going through scaphoid fracture surgery. As a clinician, it is vitally important to understand the surgery procedure in order to develop a rehabilitation protocol that will be effective in returning the patient to their normal activities of daily living. 

Social Barriers to Children’s Health and Well-being: A secondary review of social determinants of health as a standard of care in pediatrics. (Honors Capstone Project)

Sarah Keefe

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 103 // 3:30 PM

Mentor: Renda Ross, Social Work

The effects of social determinants of health and the impact of mitigating barriers to the health and well-being of pediatric patients is examined through a qualitative secondary review. Articles found through searching academic databases are screened for relevance and further evaluated. An ecological systems lens is used as a theoretical framework for this study; incorporating evidence-based practices, such as trauma-informed care and the adverse childhood experiences study (Koita, et. al, 2018). Services that target environmental factors are recommended to achieve better outcomes. Thirty-seven articles are examined to augment effective practices that target social and environmental factors during treatment. Results are discussed within the context of best practices for pediatric patients, revealing a general trend aimed at positive outcomes of care. Strengths and limitations of the study are discussed. 

Grentrification Policy Analysis

Rachael Kousaie

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Robert Bennett, Social Work

Gentrification is the process of increasing the property value of houses in run-down neighborhoods to push out the inhabitants and bring in wealth and business. The purpose of this project is to study the policies that have allowed gentrification to occur, provide information on the impact of gentrification, and recommend solutions through the revision of policies in Ohio. During the Great Depression, the Roosevelt administration passed the Fair Housing Act to provide incentives for developers to purchase run-down houses, at a value below the actual market rate, to develop and resell property at higher values. This resulted in redlining: refusing loans to families living in areas that are defined as poor. The method used to analyze social policy related to gentrification was the application of the Gilbert and Terrell (2009) and Trauma-Informed policy analysis frameworks. These frameworks suggest gentrification has negative impacts on families experiencing financial burden, pushing them out of their current neighborhoods into underdeveloped neighborhoods, which can be a traumatic experience. In order to resolve this issue, policies such as redlining need to be changed and families living in developed communities need to come together to help those living in underdeveloped communities. 

Campus Outbreak: The Spread of Contagious Viruses within the Capital University Community

Daniel Kuder, Caitlin Carpenter, Eva Peterson-Smith, Kennedy Harden

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Spread of the coronavirus Covid-19 has now caused a global pandemic, and widespread fear of the virus can be found in many communities. When in concentrated areas, such as college campuses, sporting events, etc. the virus is known to be more effective in spreading from person to person. This particular virus has many similarities to the influenza (flu) virus which plagues nations worldwide each year, but little is known about how rapidly these viruses might spread within a university population. To seek an answer to that question this study utilizes the SEIR computational model to simulate the spread of a virus through the Capital University community. The computer model is being coupled with a survey of Capital University’s students, faculty, and staff; information collected includes individual vaccination practices and factors that either inhibit or encourage vaccination. With the completed survey data, additional simulations will be run that project the effectiveness of potential vaccines under varying parameters, including vaccination rates, campus activities, and population size. The results of this study may be useful in updating current educational practices to encourage greater vaccination rates, community health, and virus awareness among the general population.

Social Networking and First Encounters

Andrea Leciejewski, AJ Beran, Hunter Dietz, Lanie Nahikian, Megan Douglas

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nick M. Vanhorn, Psychology

Increased telecommunication methods have created new constraints for maintaining intimate relationships. For instance, social media platforms make friend recommendations based on preferences and interests. Connecting like-minded individuals allows for easier and more comfortable communication in shorter timeframes. The present study measured the frequency in which students use telecommunication for intimate relationships, including if students prefer online or offline methods. Due to changes in online dating, online communication was expected to be more prevalent than offline communication, and used more frequently for conflict management, to communicate with potential suitors. Further, relationships were expected to be more likely to be short term versus long term. A convenience sample of participants (n=78) self-reported dating and online communication habits via an online survey. Results indicated that telecommunication technology has a negative relationship with individuals' likelihood to engage in face to face interactions when pursuing companionship. However, no significant difference in relationship stability was found between companionship initiated online versus offline. In addition, despite perceived benefits of prescreening potential suitor's online profiles, comfort levels during initial meetings were constant. Further research could provide insight into how online dating agencies could better improve dating platforms to maximize user success and satisfaction.

 
What Difference Does Instruction Make?

Alicia Logue

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nisreen Daoud, Education

An action research project was conducted in a kindergarten classroom to experiment with effective instructional strategies. The case study focused on one student- diagnosed with cerebral palsy-who is on an Individualized Education Plan, obtains pull-out services in math and language arts, receives physical therapy, occupational therapy, and speech therapy. Utilizing the students’ standardized assessment (MAP), the focus of the action research study was supporting her one-to-one correspondence and number identification in order to demonstrate progress towards grade-level performance. Universal Design Learning principles was implemented to ensure the student was receiving instruction in her zone of proximal development, ZPD (Golding & Wass, 2014). The student was also being taught cognitive strategies and self-regulation skills that kept the student from resorting to guessing on material she may actually know. Instructional and cognitive strategies included metacognition, positive reinforcement, and progress monitoring. Data was collected in the form of quantitative and qualitative findings based on mathematical abilities. The student data was analyzed by a line graph that demonstrates student progress. The data showed growth in the students’ math skills throughout the course of instruction, improving by six points her number recognition and nine points her one-to-one correspondence. 


Total Elbow Arthroplasty

Victoria Long

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Total elbow arthroplasty (TEA) is a surgical procedure that occurs at the elbow where the damaged portions of the humerus and ulna are replaced with artificial components. An incision is made at the posterior aspect of the elbow, with a humeral cut being made at the superior surface of the olecranon fossa and subarticular L-shaped cut made at the proximal part of the ulna. The boney mass is then removed and replaced with replacement stems entering into the humerus and ulna, connected by a hinge pin. The purpose of this surgery is to correct the distorted anatomy of the elbow which can be caused by: a fracture of the distal humerus with intraarticular extension, rheumatoid arthritis, osteoarthritis, or instability. This procedure is most commonly seen in the older population. It is important for the clinician to take into consideration the daily activities of their specific patients, past medical history, and designing a proper rehabilitation protocol, as TEA is not recommended for active athletes or persons who plan to return to intense, physical activity. The following peer-reviewed literature will describe the anatomy of the elbow, the total arthroplasty procedure, and the rehabilitation phases for patients recovering from total elbow arthroplasty. 


Surgical Infections in the Gynecological Oncology patient (Graduate Research Forum)

Taylor Longenette

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kathy Fernandez, Nursing

Gynecological cancer among the female population across the United States is on the rise. The American Cancer Society estimates about 94,000 women will be diagnosed with gynecological cancer each year in the United States. Surgical site infections account for the largest complication amongst gynecological oncology procedures. With new surgical techniques, robotic assisted surgery is becoming the choice for surgeons across the country over the traditional laparotomy and open abdomen and pelvic procedures due to the rate of infection decreasing over the years. With cancer being one of the leading causes of death among humans in the United States, it is important to find surgical procedures that ensure patient safety and ensure clinical success. The purpose of this paper is to explore research on surgical site infection rates and comparison of surgical procedures for gynecological oncology patients. Research was conducted with the use of literature reviews and meta-analysis research articles. This work is important to me due to my work in oncology surgical nursing and my future as a nurse educator to grow my knowledge of the cancer community. 

Interactive Learning and Flipped Classroom (Graduate Research Forum)

Taylor Longenette

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kathy Fernandez, Nursing

The growth of online classrooms in undergraduate nursing education is rising year by year. Traditional and non-traditional nursing programs are moving towards online and hybrid programs to better suit student and faculty schedules. Online and hybrid courses require faculty to have a variety of teaching methods to facilitate the interaction between the teacher and the learner. Online education involves internet-delivered courses or training in which students can participate from any number of locations, including their homes. Course materials are delivered synchronously, asynchronously, or in a combination of both. Assessment of learners with the use of a survey that evaluates visual, auditory, reading/writing, and kinesthetic (VARK) learning styles in students is key for faculty to maintain a successful learning environment and determine the best learning style for the online or hybrid classroom. With online and hybrid classroom, faculty must learn to turn a non-traditional face to face course into an interactive learning environment with the use of games, case studies, online quizzes and testing, and discussion boards. The purpose of this paper is to explore research on the validation of the use of VARK in the interactive learning environments and flipped classrooms in nursing education. This research was conducted with the use of literature reviews and meta-analysis on the use of interactive learning environments and the flipped classroom. This work is important to me as a future educator and the move towards more online courses in nursing education. It is important to be well informed on the proper use of interactive learning in the flipped classroom to guarantee success for the student. 

Surgical Techniques Abstract: Rotator Cuff Repair Surgery

Alex Lowry

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Rotator cuff injuries are fairly common and can be the result of overuse or an acute injury. Depending on how this injury occurs (overuse or acute) the mechanism of injury changes, but the end result leads to a torn rotator cuff muscle that will need to be repaired through surgery. There are four rotator cuff muscles; the subscapularis, supraspinatus, infraspinatus, and the teres minor and any combination of them can be injured in someone undergoing a rotator cuff repair surgery. When the tendon is completely torn, the appropriate surgical technique is to reattach the torn tendon but, when the tendon is only partially torn, as it is in a strain, the tendon is trimmed and smoothed down (debrided) to reduce the friction that is the main source of the pain. This literature review will go through the specifics of how the surgery is performed and the implication on the patients’ ability to not only perform regular activities of daily living but also their ability to continue to participate in athletics. More specifically, it will focus on the formation of rehabilitation protocol with the end goal of returning athletes to their sport most efficiently following this surgery.

 Blockchain Technology

Taylor Manivanh

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 231 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Li Feng, Math, Computer Science, & Physics

Bitcoin was invented in 2008 and allowed mutually mistrusting peers to trade without a traditional trusted third party such as a bank. Bitcoin was built on top a blockchain, which focused on an immutable and sequential series of records that are chained together by an algorithm. The goal of this research project was to expand my research on Byzantine Fault Tolerance protocols and understand how a blockchain functions by running a local blockchain server. The server developed handles several peers that make changes to the blockchain and reaches a consensus to create an authoritative chain. A simple Proof-of-Work algorithm that is widely used in Bitcoin was been implemented in the server. The blockchain server was run on Python and different peers were able to interact through HTTP request with the program Postman. When the server reached a consensus, the information within the chain was stored in a SQL database and displayed in a user-friendly interface. The results from the project demonstrated that a blockchain is a proof that allows peers to digitally own data, goods, and assets. Besides cryptocurrencies, a blockchain can be applied to provide an electronic solution among a network of mistrusting peers without a third trusted party. 

Afraid: Minority Fear of the Police and Racial Threat Theory

Breeanna Marion

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Laura Kane, Sociology & Criminology

High profile cases of police brutality towards black men have consumed the media in recent years, as evident by the creation of the widespread Black Lives Matter movement.The media attention to this issue has created a widespread knowledge about tensions between minority communities and police officers. However, an infrequently discussed topic is the fear that has resulted from this social phenomena. The purpose of this project is to analyze current literary findings that address the fear experienced by minority community members relative to their interactions with police as well as how Racial Threat Theory can be applied to the issue of police violence towards minorities. This project analyzes published works in the fields of criminology and sociology to draw conclusions about fear experienced by minorities in relation to the police. This analysis is expected to show the prevalence of high levels of fear in minority communities and that racial threat theory explains to some extent police violence towards minorities. This work is impactful for criminology and victimology because it draws conclusions between research that could potentially lead to policy change, primarily in the form of victims rights. 

Social Media Influences on Environmental Issues

Paige Matuszynski, Alea Hankinson, Nic Smith

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nick M. Vanhorn, Psychology

Social media influences our lives and partially determines what people care about. An example of this is environmental activism through trends seen on social media. This study was done to see if environmental trends on social media would create more awareness in people and help them to create healthy environmental habits (e.g., reusable bottles, straws, bags, etc). A survey including three sections–demographics, social media/trends, and behaviors–assessed how user awareness to issues corresponds to behavioral compensations. Respondents consisted of a sample of adult social media users. Questions assessed users’ exposure and awareness of recent environmental trends as well as if and how their behaviors have changed in response. Our hypothesis is that people are more likely to act on environmental trends seen on social media and there will be influence differences dependent on which social media is used. This study can be used in the future to create better environmental campaigns, to help better understand the reasons behind personal environmental activism, and to help spread awareness for lesser known environmental issues. 

Negative Traits of Social Media Sites

Faida McCain, Courtney Hall, Delaney Chester

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Research has found social media to impact the well-being of users. For example, prior studies estimate that most college students spend several hours per day on social media, negatively impacting psychological processes. In addition to time consumption, social media exposes users to misinformation. This study investigated three sources of user risk exposure: cyberbullying, catfishing, and news reliability. A survey of undergraduates measured risk exposure across three social media platforms: Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter. While Twitter offers the option to private an account, it is a feature rarely used. As the most open site, we expect the highest cyberbullying rates and most trustworthy news on Twitter. Further, catfishing likelihood is anticipated to be greatest on Facebook due to its rich networking features. The importance of this study is to identify at-risk students, hopefully leading to more informed users, and lessening the risk of encountering the negative traits of social media.

Effects of YouTube Vlogs on Social Influence of College Students

Emma McDermott, Emily Eaton, Bayli Pope, Tyler Ferguson, Taylor Kousaie

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Balancing academics with social life is a challenge for college students. Some seek the advice of college vloggers for social life and academic tips. In particular, the social platform YouTube is recognized for its advantages of providing educational resources, entertainment, social networking, and its effects on social influence. Social influence involves social comparison and social conformity. This study investigated the effects of viewing YouTube vlogs (academic-focused vs. party-focused) on social influence in college students. Items from a modified version of the Attitude Homophily/Social Attractiveness and Audience Participation assessments were used to measure modeling behavior/conformity. Social comparison in viewers was measured using questions adapted from the Perceived Credibility of Vloggers and Social Comparison questionnaires. Results revealed a significant relationship between vlog type and social comparison and behavior modeling habits. Perceived credibility of vloggers also varied by vlog type. These results are important because understanding the relationship between viewing vlogs and lifestyle perceptions can spread awareness of the occurrences of social influence.

Development of depression in children living in a household with secondhand smoke

Casey Miller, Taylor Molnar, Shane Niemeier

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

It has been established that secondhand smoke can contribute to numerous ailments within adolescents. These ailments range from respiratory illnesses to cancers. It is predicted that there is a strong correlation between growing up exposed to secondhand smoke and the development of depression. The National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (NHANES) is designed to assess the health and nutritional status of Americans. It combines interviews and physical examinations of millions of participants on a two-year cycle, beginning in 1999. The current study is using the NHANES database to analyze the number of adolescents exposed to secondhand smoke in the household and their development of depression. This study will contribute to a further understanding of any correlation in development of depression in children living in a household with secondhand smoke.

#FamilyRoomClose: How the new Ronald McDonald Family Room is helping to keep families closer in their time of need

Joshua Miller, Zach Ferenchak, Albany Fridley, Alex Mills, Tommy Bruning, Nate Hartzler

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 102 // 1:30 PM

Mentors: Lois Foreman-Wernet, Media

On March 1st, 2020, Nationwide Children’s Hospital opened the Big Lots Behavioral Health Pavilion, a new hospital designed to help fight the mental and behavioral health crisis in youth. Within the hospital, Ronald McDonald House Charities of Central Ohio is opening the world’s largest Ronald McDonald Family Room. The Ronald McDonald Family Room is a place that allows families to rest and regroup just moments away from their child in care. To help raise awareness for the new Family Room, RMHC in partnership with Fahlgren Mortine recruited the help of PR 494 Client-Based Immersion students. The class was challenged to help RMHC open the new Family Room and raise awareness for the purpose it aims to serve. The class was divided into three groups: Social Media, Video, and Media Relations. The groups worked together to research, plan, implement, and evaluate a comprehensive communication campaign for the new space. In the presentation students will unveil the efforts of each group and the work they have created to help the Ronald McDonald House Charities of Central Ohio open its new Family Room.

Equalizers: A Study in How Circuitry Effects the Characteristics of Sound (Honors Capstone Project)

Micahel Molaskey

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Mark Lochstampfor, Russ Nagy, Music

Technology has been shaping how we listen to music for centuries. From psychoacoustic principles used in smartphone speakers, to the shrinking of storage size of digital copies of songs we have been using technology to both improve the quality and accessibility of our favorite music. In this study I will be analyzing how the circuitry used in an audio equalizer impacts the perceived tonal characteristics of the processed audio. By researching what parts of the equalizer’s circuitry, we can begin to engineer an equalizer that will improve the quality of the audio. To test this hypothesis, I will be conducting an experiment where I change parts of the test equalizer’s circuit then process audio through the various iterations of the equipment then record the result. I will then play back the recorded audio, and the original to a group of test subjects individually. The subjects will then be asked to assign characteristics to each sample that is played and then rank them by which sample they liked the most. The goal of this study is to build the best equalizer circuit based on consumer data. 

How have sexual education curricula influenced the incidence of chlamydia infections?

Desiree Molina, Mikala Thurman, Anell Agyapong

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

One of the most common sexually transmitted diseases in the United States is chlamydia. Chlamydia can infect men and women and can cause serious reproductive problems if left untreated. The objective of this project is to review chlamydia rates in the United States from 1999-2016 and to evaluate if changing sexual education curricula has decreased the rate of chlamydia infections. Prior to 2010, sexual education curricula focused on abstinence-based practices, as it was assumed that families should bear the responsibility of educating their children/dependents about safe sex. These policies may not adequately prepare youth and could leave them susceptible to unplanned pregnancies and sexually transmitted diseases. To research this correlation, the investigators are looking at different sexual education curricula and the percentage of individuals who tested positive for chlamydia. The National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey database is designed to assess the health statuses of Americans through interviews and physical exams. This database is being used to obtain results from urine screenings for chlamydia. Then, the investigators are using a timeline of sexual education curricula from the National SexEd Conference. This work is important for both parents and schools to learn which curricula are effective in educating children about sex.

21st Century Archival Procedures in a University Setting

Brenna Mullins

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Andrew Carlson, History

In the summer of 2019, I presented my project at the summer scholars’ presentation. The purpose of my project was to shed light on archival procedures in universities, specifically here at Capital University. My research method was purely immersive; I have been working in the archives for almost two years now, so by working and collecting information along the way, I was able to compile this information into a presentation. None of my findings were particularly surprising, since I’ve been at the job for awhile now, but it excites me when I get to share the behind-the-scenes work that goes on in the archives. Regardless, I found ways to implement new archival methods in the Capital University archives. My work contributes to the archival discipline, especially in universities, by explaining procedures and why they are necessary to running successful university archives.

Under the Purple Shroud: Exploring the Legacy of Empress Theodora (circa 500CE-548CE, Byzantine Empire)

Brenna Mullins

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 103 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Alexander Pantsov, History

In the Fall of 2019, I researched the legacy of Empress Theodora of the Byzantine Empire for my Capstone project. My goal was to dissect the many arguments about her, as some argued that she treated her subjects cruelly, while others believed she treated the underprivileged with kindness and respect. I conducted my research by examining both primary and secondary sources. Surprisingly, many secondary sources praised Theodora, while her contemporaries tended to harshly criticize her. On top of this, Theodora has become a feminist icon for many modern day feminists, which surprised me because of how her contemporaries vilified her (although, I should mention that the primary sources available all come from men). Overall, this research contributes to the field of history because it allows for one to understand how to appropriately research controversial figures of history. One must always look at all arguments before determining the accuracy of the legacy of a person. Therefore, I believe that by analyzing figures such as Empress Theodora allows historians to sift through all of the arguments in order to find the facts.

But What About Hip-Hop?

Malik Murray

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Neal Schmitt, Music

Hip-Hop is currently the top selling genre of music in the US. However, the Music Technology program at Capital University does not use the genre in its approach to teaching audio engineers. Is this to the detriment of students? By engineering a 4-song Hip Hop EP from start to finish, I will determine if the skills learned in my time at Capital are transferable to Hip-Hop, even though the genre was never explicitly taught. The purpose of this project is to ascertain if Capital University’s Music Technology program should reconsider integrating Hip Hop music into its pedagogical methods. I will determine this by seeking out a Hip-Hop act, walking through pre-production with them to determine suitable inspirations from the current Hip Hop scene, selecting four songs from the act’s catalog, tracking, mixing and mastering the songs, then comparing our final product to our previously determined inspirations. At the conclusion of my research, I will donate the Pro Tools sessions from my project to the Music Technology program at Capital University for future students to learn from. 

 
Female Sex Workers, Stigma, & Homicide

Delanie Nahikian

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 105 // 1:30

Mentor: Laura Kane, Sociology & Criminology

This paper analyzes how the stigma surrounding prostitution affects sex workers’ likelihood of being murdered and the effectiveness of the investigations of their murders. I conducted a critical analysis of the literature to discover how sex workers were viewed by both society and law enforcement. I found that societal stigma is a force that reduces formal and informal protections available to sex workers, seen through the conclusion that society itself wishes them gone and law enforcement culture is misogynistic in nature. This study emphasizes the need for a clear change of how sex work is viewed within the criminal justice system because the prosecution of sex work is creating a stigmatizing barrier that creates two lines of victimization. Sex workers are clearly victims of homicide, but they are also victims of structural policies that criminalize their occupation and make it much harder to seek help from societal institutions such as the police.

Rhetorically Analyzing Salve Deus Rex Judaeorum: Aemilia Lanyer's Gendered Rhetoric

Sierra Parker

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 212 // 3:30 PM

Mentor: Kevin Griffith, English

The literary canon often excludes female writers’ voices because women have traditionally been kept on society’s margins regarding writing and making public arguments. Recently, scholars have begun making efforts to acknowledge these writers’ merits and praise their voices in literary scholarship. Only recently have critics recognized Aemilia Lanyer, who wrote a poetry book titled Salve Deus Rex Judaeorum that she published in 1611. In the book, she makes an argument for female liberty, founding her assertions in biblical stories and traditions. These critics have commented on her bravery and specific aspects of her rhetorical situation, but none have provided a comprehensive rhetorical analysis. My research article analyzes her rhetoric using the rhetorical appeals, showing how she uses rhetorical strategies to navigate her historical situation. Her culture would have frowned upon a woman making public arguments, but Lanyer cleverly balances her rhetoric to undercut its boldness and appear proper. The rhetorical analysis shows how she was likely inspired by Queen Elizabeth I in that she uses double-voicedness, employing both traditionally female and traditionally male rhetoric to navigate socially circumscribed boundaries while appropriating authoritative positions to present her argument.

Investigations of the Potential Downstream Effects of Mutagens Produced by Algae

Maggie Peddicord

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Jennifer Larson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Scientists in recent years have found that cultures have shown an increased proportion of antibiotic resistance in some bacteria due to pollution. Water pollution is a prevalent issue becoming more serious than we know how to manage. I will specifically examine the effects of certain toxins (Microcystin-LR) on a few aquatic bacterial strains (Escherichia coli and Rhizobium leguminosarum) to see how their genetic makeup is impacted. The main goal of this research project is to examine the mutagenicity of the cyanotoxin microcystin on E. coli and R. leguminosarum bacteria. To establish culturing protocols, we tested 5 different concentrations of microcystin against the growth of E. coli and R. leguminosarum. Bacteria was incubated at 30˚ C and monitored for 24 hours. This was to reveal if there was any toxicity at the concentrations of microcystin used. After incubation, the 5 samples were exposed to no antibiotic (control) and 3 types of antibiotics to test for any signs of antibiotic resistance. Quantitative and qualitative data were collected during this experiment and an analysis of our findings will be presented at the Research Symposium. My work can help contribute to research being done concerning antibiotic resistant bacteria due to polluted waterways. 

Music Therapy and Cancer Pain

Hailey Perdue, Blake Randleman, Rachel Vallette

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicole Poellet, Nursing

There are increasing rates of cancer diagnoses around the world each year. Pain is an important aspect of treatment in cancer patients and remains to be a common problem. Unrelieved pain is associated with anxiety, depression, decreased quality of life, and death. Music gives patients a hope for the future, an escape from stress, brings back good memories, gives an extra person to provide care (music therapist), and brings beauty to suffering. The primary focus of this literature search was to discover the effectiveness of music therapy as a relief of pain in cancer patients. We searched the literature on this topic by exploring the scholarly database CINHAL. We used keywords such as “pain,” “pain relief,” “oncology,” “cancer,” “music therapy,” and “music intervention.” Nine out of the ten research articles we reviewed reported decreased pain among cancer patients after the use of music therapy. Additional findings were that music therapy is a complementary approach to holistic nursing, has no side effects, produces no harm and is non-addictive. Our recommendations for future studies include the difference between music therapists’ styles and MP3 players, results of different music genres, and how the environment can affect the experience of music therapy. 

Preference for Sensory Complexity

Sophia Petrov

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Richard Ashbrook, Psychology

Previous studies have shown that individuals exhibit situational preferences based on their personality. New research is needed to accommodate the proliferation of technology-mediated environments (e.g., social media, podcasts, video streaming) in relation to individuals’ sensory stimulation preferences as understood as an expression of underlying personality. This study considers how introverts and extraverts express their preference for different levels of complexity. Capital University undergraduate participants recruited through SONA completed the Qualtrics-administered, 91-item Multidimensional Introversion-Extraversion Scale. Participants indicated their preference for visual complexity across 9-trials of visual images, which vary by number of lines, patterns, and colors. Each participant was sequentially exposed to three conditions (control/no background sound, low social stimulation/nature sounds; high social stimulation/crowded coffee shop sounds). Participants who endorse introversion were predicted to prefer less visual complexity. This project has the potential to inform individuals about the optimal sensory conditions for their personality type, thus effectively guiding them in technology-mediated environments.

School and Latinx Identity

Kaylee Prall

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

Education is a critical aspect in the development of Latinx identity. Latinxs have the highest school dropout rate, which measures even higher among those that are English Language Learners. According to a study conducted by Marquette University, 59 percent of English Language Learners drop out of school before graduation (López, 2010). This is an astonishing rate, and a grave problem. This work explores identity among Latinxs in the school setting, and how their sense of identity contributes to the dropout rate. The way Latinx students view themselves, specifically in academic settings and in relation to their academic success, is directly affected by the expectations and perceptions of family, peers and educators. The self-perception of Latinx students is strongly influenced by the attitudes of peers and educators. This work examines multiple investigations that show a correlation between the ethnic composition of schools, the attitudes of peers and educators, and the self-identity of the Latinx students. The results from this research show that Latinx students who have a positive sense of identity will be higher achieving in academics and lower dropout rates. A positive self-perception are a result of high expectations from educators, peers and family. 

Vaping Related Behaviors Among Fraternity and Sorority Members in Small Universities.

Trudy Railing, Emilee Gavan

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Julie Polta Dallas, Health & Sport Sciences

Since its introduction just a few years ago, vaping has been viewed as a better alternative to smoking cigarettes. Vaping is the action of inhaling and exhaling vapor produced by an electronic produced or similar device. These new products initially were considered a revolutionary way for individuals addicted to cigarettes to stop smoking while avoiding nicotine withdrawal. However, recent pulmonary complications are creating a health crisis comparable to long-term cigarette use. Among students on small university campuses, it is suspected those in sororities and fraternities are more prone to vaping or to using similar devices. To determine why those in Greek life have become major users of vaping products, students, ages 18-25, at five small universities in Ohio will be surveyed: Capital, Otterbein, Denison, Ohio Wesleyan, Wittenberg. The distribution of our anonymous survey will test the hypothesis that social interactions are the most influential reasons college students start vaping. This investigation is important because little research has been done on this novel topic, especially on young adults, ages 18-25, who make up the majority of those dying from pulmonary complications. From these research findings, the adverse effects of vaping can be directly addressed to those most likely to engage in vaping behaviors. 

Success of Cultural Patrimony Repatriation Requests as Related to Indigenous Tactics and International Norms

Aaron Roos

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Kevin Lucas, Political Science

The repatriation of displaced artworks and architecture as an international norm is the research topic that I will focus on. Third-world developing countries with large indigenous populations are the main communities affected by this displacement. Therefore, these communities’ desire for repatriation and the international community's response will be the focus of this research. The specific research question that I will examine asks to what lengths should these indigenous communities go to in order to receive repatriated artworks. Another important question is what the likely international community's response will be to such requests for repatriation. My hypothesis is that a multifaceted approach is the most effective tactic that the indigenous community must use in their efforts to recover displaced artworks and architecture. Also, the international community will be more willing to repatriate artwork depending on certain circumstances. The methodological approach I will use is hypothesis generated research by comparing case studies. My work will show a correlation for what norms of repatriation will be accepted by the international community and what tactics are most useful for repatriation. This is important research because demands for repatriation will increase as development in the third world increases. 

The Positive Effects of a BioBlitz on Self-Reported College Student Stress Levels and Species Identification of Primmer Outdoor Learning Center

Kory Roth, Mac Teeple

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Pressures from academic life can cause stress and anxiety in college students. Learning to cope with and manage these emotions can prove difficult. The purpose of this study was to determine if spending time outdoors for 60-120 minutes while participating in a BioBlitz, an activity where participants try to identify species of chosen kingdoms and classes, is able to reduce stress in college students. A total of 6 individuals participated in the study at the Primmer Outdoor Learning Center in Logan, Ohio. The property consists of 7 ecosystems with the study being held in the deciduous forest and wetland. Self-reported stress, on a scale of 0-10, pre-activity responses had an average of 7.3土1.96 and post-activity had an average of 2.5土1.76. The results were significant concluding that spending time outdoors for 60-120 minutes participating in a BioBlitz can lower stress levels in college students. Students reported some favorite species from activity to be the Bald Eagle (Haliaeetus leucocephalus), White-tailed Deer (Odocoileus virginianus), and the Sugar Maple Tree (Acer saccharum). Future studies could benefit from higher participation. This study hoped to encourage more students to learn from nature to destress from academic rigor.

The Benefits of Coastal Wetland Restoration in Southwest Florida

Kory Roth

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Suzanne Marilley, Political Science & Economics

According to the United Nations, 67% of mangrove forests have been lost in the past century due to human impacts including lack of government regulations. Specifically, in the southern state of Florida, Tampa Bay has lost 44% of coastal wetland areas including mangroves and salt marshes (Florida EPA, 2019). Mangroves provide essential nursery protection for many marine animals and also provide habitats for many bird and crustacean species. The loss of mangroves trees has triggered significant declines in two avian species, Mangrove Cuckoo and Black-Whiskered Vireos, dependent on mangroves (Lloyd & Doyle 2011). The British Broadcasting Corporation estimates that mangroves provide environmental services, including storm protection and climate change defense, valued at $10,821/hectare (Anderson 2010). My research focuses on the economic impacts of mangrove restorations on intercoastal regions in southwest Florida, particularly Tampa Bay and the Gulf. The expected results of this research may show that restoring marine habitats may provide benefits to both native species and humans. In order to expeditiously restore these areas, the results may also show that government intervention from regulatory and enforcement agencies such as the EPA and Army Core of Engineers will be necessary. 

Ways to increase employee productivity in the workplace

Elizabeth Sadek

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Andrea M. Karkowski, Psychology, Elene Kent, Business

Increasing employee productivity in the workplace is important for most employers and companies across the world. Research demonstrated that multiple factors affect employees’ productivity. Some of these workplace factors are compensation and benefits, work-life balance, training, feedback, and feeling appreciated within the workplace. The purpose of this study was to further examine the relationship between employee productivity rates and other workplace factors. Employees at a Columbus company completed a survey that asked about productivity and workplace factors. Results indicate the degree to which each of the workplace factors is related to employee productivity. This research advances understanding of workplace flow and can be used to inform how changes in a workplace relate to productivity.

An Analysis of Climate Change Through an Editorial

Ethan Scheck, Breanna Vance, Heather Fryman

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Suzanne Marilley, Political Science & Economics

In response to an eye-opening alert to an editorial, “We must stop threats to the environment while it’s still possible,” we documented the severity of several threats: (1) The Trump administration’s attempt “to reverse a rule limiting the use of pesticides and other chemicals near waterways,” (2) “to lower fuel efficiency standards for vehicles,” and (3) the placement of limits on “research studies that can be considered in policymaking to only those whose raw data can be made available to the public and industry to examine.” Our research employed documents from the EPA, court documents, and scientific studies. Our findings indicate that laws in place prior to the election of Donald J. Trump provided latitude for fossil fuel industries to side step restrictions, that lowering fuel efficiency standards would certainly increase greenhouse gas emissions and probably accelerate global warming, and that proposed restrictions on scientific research would inhibit the collection of data necessary for understanding climate change. The compilation of the research indicates that the opinions in the article can be supported by the scientific information that was analyzed. This research contributes to the validity of information that is distributed and provided verification for statements that were made. 


Athletic Trainers' Role in a High School Setting

Samantha Sech, Emily Hughes, Rachel Ellis, Caroline Taphorn

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Athletic Trainers (AT) are healthcare professionals that aid in the immediate care and prevention of athletic injuries on a physical, mental, and emotional level. Athletic trainers are often misconstrued as strength and conditioning coaches or personal trainers due to their affiliation with athletic departments and individual interpretations of their title. This occurs more often than not in a secondary school setting, where their role in athletics is limited due to a lack of resources and awareness by athletes, coaches, and parents.  Having a complete understanding of the roles of an AT in a secondary school setting allows athletes to fully utilize all assets available to them, in order to receive the best quality of care. The purpose of this project is to advocate for the proper identification and education of an AT’s practice in a secondary school setting. This project was presented at Hilliard Darby High School explaining the roles of an AT in the secondary school setting. The students were given a pre and post survey to assess their knowledge and perceptions of an AT. It is expected that the student’s knowledge and perceptions of AT will increase after the presentation. 

Investigation into the presence of antibiotics and antibiotic-resistant bacteria in the rhizosphere of trees

Emily Simonton

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 218 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Alan Stam, Biological & Environmental Sciences

The rhizosphere is known as the microbiome of the plant, and although it is a small area of soil adjacent to plant roots, it is vital to plant health. It combats pathogens, enhances nutrient absorption, and aids in healthy colonization. The diversity of microbial species within the rhizosphere in contrast to bulk soil makes competition among organisms crucial to their survival. Antibiotic production and subsequent resistance are two defense mechanisms that bacteria have developed as a result. The goal of this study was to test for inherent antibiotic resistance and exposure within rhizobacteria. Rhizosphere soil samples were collected from seven tree species in Southeastern Ohio. Bacterial colonies were grown on non-selective media, isolated, and tested with seven naturally produced antibiotics. Growth indicated likely resistance to the antibiotic. While the results varied among tree species, bacteria grew in the presence of each antibiotic, and the rhizosphere soil from each tree species contained bacteria that exhibited resistance to at least one antibiotic. These results support the adaptive nature of diverse microbial communities within the rhizosphere and indicate a possible natural occurrence of each antibiotic. Many possibilities exist regarding future research into the presence of antibiotic resistance and antibiotics in the rhizosphere.

The Impact of an Outdoor Creative Arts Project on an Individual's Nature Connectedness

Sydney Skeie, Emma Young, Charis Friend

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

One’s concern for other living organisms and their enjoyment of being out in nature is determined by how they view themselves in relation to the natural environment. Individuals who typically feel more connected to nature tend to engage in more sustainable behaviors and promote ecologically responsible behaviors. The goal of the study was to determine the relationship between nature connectedness and outdoor experience. Five volunteers participated in an outdoor creative arts project at Primmer Outdoor Learning Center in Logan, Ohio. An identical five-minute survey was distributed before and after completion of the activity to provide data for statistical analyses. The scores were averaged for the pre- and post- surveys as 4.6 ± -0.9 and 5.2 ± -0.8. Although the results revealed no significant difference in the responses of participants before and after the study, participants had felt highly connected to nature before and after the activity. Future work should evaluate if there is a correlation between an engaging outdoor activity and nature connectedness. It is vital to promote nature connectedness to combat current environmental issues such as climate change, species endangerment, and habitat degradation. 
 
Gluten cross-contamination: reliability of the “gluten-free” label on food products in the US

Sydney Skeie, Alysa Durbin

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Gluten is a protein complex found in wheat, barely, and rye, and even in foods that do not normally contain these grains. It is necessary for those with gluten intolerance, especially Celiac disease, to avoid gluten cross-contamination and be skeptical of the gluten levels in food products advertised as “gluten-free”. The current study was designed to determine the reliability of “gluten-free” food labels in the consumer marketplace. A total of 168 samples labeled “gluten-free” were obtained from restaurants, grocery stores, and health-food stores in the US. A Nima Gluten Sensor (antibody-based colorimetric assay) was utilized to determine if gluten content was <20 ppm, the maximum allowed by US law for a product labeled “gluten-free”. Of the samples tested, 71 were certified as “gluten-free” (<10 ppm) by the Gluten-Free Certification Organization (GFCO); only 3 of these (4.2% of samples) were found to exceed 20 ppm of gluten. By comparison, 97 samples were labeled “gluten-free”, but did not indicate certification; of these, 31 (32.0%) contained more gluten than allowed by law. While results reveal that “certified gluten-free” products may be more trusted in their claim of being “gluten-free”, contamination can still occur for those who receive an inflammatory response by gluten grains.


 
 The Prevalence of Sulfur-Reducing Microorganisms at Primmer Outdoor Learning Center

Bri Smith, Vanessa Snyder, Maria Montoya

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 218 // 2:30 PM

Mentors: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Sulfur can come in many forms and colors, and is insoluble in water, therefore, it needs to be metabolized or reduced by microorganisms. The reduction of sulfate yields hydrogen sulfide. Hydrogen sulfide can be detrimental to the environment and surrounding ecosystems. It is flammable, corrosive, and very poisonous. Sulfate reduction can be achieved by certain bacteria via metabolic enzymes. This study is meant to survey the wetlands of Primmer Outdoor Learning Center for sulfur reducing microorganisms. If sulfate reducing microorganisms are present within the water samples, then they will be present less than 10% of the time. Water samples were taken from three locations at Primmer: the wetland, the beaver pond, and a nearby stream. The bacterial species present in the water samples were isolated using a quadrant streak method. These isolates were then inoculated on a SIM medium to test for sulfate reduction. Sulfate reduction was observed through a color change in the media. Colony 3 from Sample 3 was the only species capable of sulfur reduction. The Chi-square value is 1.481. The p-value is .22354. The result is not significant at p < .05. Less than 10% of sulfate reducing microorganisms are present in the samples. 


Understanding the Benefits of Living on Campus

Nicolas Smith

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Andrea M. Karkowski, Psychology

Students have been involved in higher education for many generations but understanding how to make the college experience set students up for a positive future is the key. The data and survey results gained over the last few years from surveys will show that the college skills gained go well beyond the classroom into social skills. Students engage in diverse experiences that allow them to grow into a more successful person and be successful in future careers. The data obtained from the different survey results show that the practices implemented by Capital University are making a positive difference in the lives of students, but there are more improvements that can be made. Through the data interpretation, the results will show that we can learn additional opportunities to help undergraduate students. The information will be utilized by the Residence Life Office to implement necessary improvements to the 2020-2021 school year and the data will continued to be analyzed in the coming semesters. 


Analog: The Lost Art

Ian Sopko

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Neal Schmitt, Music

The days of the analog recording studio are fading, but there are still those places that relish and appreciate hardware rather than computer plugins. The reason for completing an analog hardware compressor kit is to expand upon skills that have been nurtured during the past few years. The execution of the project will consist of the acquisition and construction of the Hairball audio blue stripe 1176 limiting amplifier kit followed by extensive testing of the unit against a commercially available comparable unit as well as the plugin version. The theory is that the kit should be similar sounding compared against other units to determine accuracy and individual characteristics. Testing will include sources of synthetically produced tones, acoustic guitar, percussion, and recordings of the human voice. I have chosen to study the construction of electrical components relative to the music production environment because the people trained in repairs are becoming fewer and fewer. The sharing of my findings will be an opportunity to show the differences achieved between the use analog outboard gear and its digital counterparts. As well as a view on whether it is cost effective to build your own tools or purchase them.

Trending Twitter Topics

Laura Starcher, Finn Bohlen, Alexis Stevens

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

Twitter Trending Topics provide a way for people to discuss current issues. Once popular, these topics are often covered by traditional news sources. These stories may contain headlines such as how twitter users are “outraged” by a topic, etc. What factors impact these trending topics, and impact which of these topics then get covered by traditional news sources? We used two methods to analyze this. The first was a survey covering social media usage, involvement in popular social issues, and demographics. The second was an analysis of a sample of current trending topics, including the number of retweets and any news stories covering these topics. We want to understand if retweets rise after a news story is published. We anticipate that people who use Twitter more often will be more interested in Twitter trending Topics, as many people post about current events and current social issues on social media, and that the number of retweets will spike following a news story. This research will give insight into how people use Twitter Trending Topics, and the role traditional news sources have on the popularity of these topics. 

Social Studies from an Anglo Teacher: Reflections on student teaching on the Navajo Nation.

Reagan Stone

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Olga Shonia, Education

This project examined an Anglo teacher’s understanding of her own praxis as she navigated living and teaching at the boarding school on the Navajo reservation as well as engaging in a service-learning project while on site. Some tribal families are reported to hold unresolved misgivings about public education and a historic mistrust of schools due to forced European-style schooling (Baldwin, 2018). Following the critical framework of Hastie, Martin and Buchanan (2006), this case study, examined student teacher’s own cultural biases going into the experience of living and working on the Reservation, and how these changed over time; apprehension as a teacher and concerns about teacher legitimacy. Specific themes that emerged included: cultural appropriation; ethical uneasiness; resolution of apprehension and concerns; community building; developing sense of belonging; appreciation of local diversity; and avoidance of assumptions. The project has implications for a teacher’s expanded understanding of own praxis reflecting on the impact of culturally immersive off-campus student teaching experiences and experiential learning opportunities. 



Doing MOrE with Theatre: Reaching Internal and External Publics (Honors Capstone Project)

Jessie Strait

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 07 // 2:30 PM

Mentor: Dan Heaton, Communication

In my capstone project I used the PR campaign method detailed in Ronald Smith’s Strategic Planning for Public Relations to launch two public relations campaigns to promote the new campus student organization Masquers Outreach Ensemble (abbreviated MOrE). This group’s mission is to foster connections between students and the community through theatre. The purpose of my project was to determine the best public relations strategies to effectively communicate with both internal (on campus) and external (the community) publics. Best practices of PR currently suggest social media is the best format for reaching publics. In my study, I used various social media platforms to reach my internal public. My results revealed that the suggested best practice was not effective. My research contributes to the field by demonstrating that word-of-mouth and face-to-face interactions, not social media usage, were more effective strategies for connecting to my specific internal public. Furthermore, I found that face-to-face networking was a more effective way to reach my external publics than social media or direct emails. This finding also contradicts suggested best practices Works Cited Smith, Ronald D. Strategic Planning for Public Relations. 5th ed., Routledge Taylor & Francis Group, 2017 

Punchlines and Borders: Humor’s Impact on the Immigrant Experience

Jacob Stuckert

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 126 // 3:30 PM

Mentors: Stephanie Saunders, Dina Lentsner, Languages & Cultures

Humor is a deceptively complex aspect of life that can differ greatly between regions and cultures. As the 2015 Spanish film Perdiendo el norte demonstrates, these differences are illuminated through the immigrant experience. The story follows two highly educated millennials as they move from their home in Spain to Germany in search of work during times of economic turmoil after the global crisis of 2008. The film treats this history-altering event as a platform for humor, turning what might have been a dismal tale into a light-hearted comedy. This paper utilizes Perdiendo el norte to investigate humor across cultures and its effect on the immigrant experience. A thematic analysis of Perdiendo el norte considers the differing styles of humor between German and Spanish cultures, as well as the use of humor as a coping mechanism for austere experiences associated with immigration such as financial woes and familiar estrangement. This discussion employs various perspectives on humor theory, particularly those of McGraw, Warren and Critchley. The objective of this research is to illuminate the connection between the role of humor and the ever-changing sense of self throughout the immigration process.

Creative Presentation of a Spanish Play

Jacob Stuckert, Lexi Anderson, Rebecca Blanton, Carlin Briggs, Heather Fryman, Pedro Garcia, Reynaldo Garcia, Kayla Null, Brighny Olvera, Torey Robert, Gabriella Schnaidt, Sharon Leticia Vargas

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 231 // 2:30 PM

Mentor: Maria Jose Delgado, Languages & Cultures

Creative Presentation This would be a creative presentation of an original play written by students matriculated in Spanish 410 Hispanic Theater. Students have written an original play and are currently peer editing. At the end of their evaluations and emendations, students will read their work in class and will vote on the most noteworthy play to be rehearsed, and performed at the Undergraduate Symposium as a collective endeavor by the entire class. Some students will perform the chosen play; others will focus on decoration, direction, visual and audio props –usually background projected images and sound-, and writing the program. Since this is a large class, some students will be editing all plays, writing an introduction, and content page for the creation of a printed book, which will include all written plays. This year, reflecting the current social-political setting, we have a variety of impactfull themes raging from immigration, loyalty in friendships, the struggles to withstand the hardships of everyday living, family’s separation (a repetitive theme in several plays), how past actions sometimes catch up with us, inevitable deaths and the impact on students’ life, to the consequences of sexual abuse. 
The Intersection of Social Media, Political Communication, and Modern Public Relations Practice (Honors Capstone Project)

Ashley Swank

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 07 // 3:00 PM

Mentors: Stephen Bruning, Public Relation, Lois Foreman-Wernet, Media

Current political candidates and government officials frequently use social media as one of their top communication methods. This has shifted political communication from consisting of solely bureaucratic procedures to broad inclusion of the public in online discussion of politicians and policy. Researchers have shown that this shift in political communication exists but have not predicted if this trend will last. The purpose of this theory-type project is to propose that future government and political communication will follow the current informal, social media-based model. My methodological approach is to analyze peer-reviewed scholarly journal articles and social media accounts from political candidates and figures, with a focus on examining politician’s Twitter accounts. I expect to find that as social media is used by politicians, they will adapt casual and informal language and post formats to reach a public familiar with that style. Government officials, their public relations managers, and the public population may benefit from the results of this study by learning how to interpret the changes from press releases to Tweets and how to effectively engage in political discourse on social media platforms using the informal format I identify.

Math Magic

Colin Swisher

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 231 // 2:00 PM

Mentors: Jonathan Stadler, Math, Computer Science, & Physics

Math is a fascinating topic to learn and master, but when paired with card tricks and mind reading illusions, math truly becomes magical. This math magic presentation will demonstrate how modular arithmetic can be used to help create the illusion of magic. The presentation will start with a unique card trick that demonstrates the mathematical concept of casting out 9’s. After proving this concept and how it works within the magic trick, another trick will be presented that uses the same modular arithmetic to perform a trick without the use of cards. The math behind these magic tricks works every time and can be recreated by any aspiring math magician. This work demonstrates the application of abstract algebra in a unique and interesting way as well as gives audience members a way of applying these mathematical concepts themselves. 

Survey of Mushroom Biodiversity at the Primmer Outdoor Learning Center

Mac Teeple, Dr. Christine Anderson

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Fruiting fungal bodies, better known as mushrooms, have been observed by humans for centuries but are still not widely understood or well-studied in Ohio. To better understand ecosystem biodiversity at Capital University’s Primmer Outdoor Learning Center in Logan, Ohio, a mushroom survey was conducted from May-August 2019 with five visits each lasting from 1-2 hours. The property contains 7 different ecosystems and this study was primarily conducted in the deciduous forest ecosystem. Preliminary identifications were made in the field and confirmed later from photographs taken on site. The total number of species found (n=21) included three species of Ascomycetes and 18 of Basidiomycetes. This represents a wide range of species from more primitive mushrooms of the class Ascomycetes and the younger class of mushrooms in Basidiomycetes than previously expected. Crust fungus such as Stereum ostrea (False-Turkey Tail) was found throughout the duration of the survey, while there were more rare species such as Cantharellus lateritius (Smooth Chanterelle) found in mid-summer. Another common species of mushroom found throughout the study was the crust fungus Trametes versicolor (Turkey Tail) which is typically found year-round. Understanding the ecological importance of mushrooms could provide answers to questions yet unknown.

Extraction and Analysis of Caffeine in Various Coffee Brands

Matthew Tyler, Molly Frey

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nyenty Arrey, Chemistry

Many people across the world consume caffeine daily from coffee. Caffeine is described as a cardiac, respiratory, and psychic stimulant, as well as a diuretic. The goals of this study were to analyze caffeine amounts in six brands of coffee via extraction, to compare the amounts of caffeine in each brand to see if they vary, and to compare these amounts to that seen in different brands of tea to see which has more caffeine. Specifically, the amount of caffeine in an average two cup serving of coffee was analyzed for this study. Average caffeine amounts varying between 0.1580 grams and 0.2775 grams were observed in the different brands of coffee analyzed. When compared to the amounts of caffeine in different brands of tea, it was observed that the coffee exhibited lower amounts of caffeine than the tea brands. This caffeine was analyzed using FT-IR and H-NMR spectral analyses and its identity was confirmed. With the role that coffee plays in the lives of many individuals, the findings from this study will help in understanding the number of cups of coffee that will be beneficial and which option, between coffee and tea, is better for one’s health and teeth.

DNA Barcoding as a Tool for Taxonomic Identification

Nate Vance, Olivia Allgier

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

DNA barcoding, a genetic method to identify species, is becoming an increasingly popular tool for assessing the biodiversity of local habitats. The purpose of the study was to use DNA barcoding to compare taxonomic research of tadpole species at Primmer Outdoor Learning Center to DNA samples collected. The seven tissue samples were processed using PCR at the CytB and 16s gene loci, cleaned using Zymoclean and ran through a 3% agarose gel to separate and visualize the products before sequencing. The results show 4 of the 6 of successfully processed DNA samples matched their taxonomic identifications, with the 16s locus being more successful in amplifying its targeted sequence. Furthermore, the results strengthened the premise that DNA barcoding should not be used to replace fieldwork but rather be used as a tool to solidify taxonomic identifications. In conclusion, the tadpole species living in Primmer belong to the more common American Bullfrog (Rana catesbeiana) and American Toad (Anaxyrus americanus), with some outliers. While these results show that no sensitive species were found at Primmer, it also showed no invasive species, indicating a generally healthy environment. By using these methods taxonomic researchers would be more able to predict the health of certain environments.

Electronic Health Records-Today's Perspectives for Tomorrow's Solutions

Kokila Varadarajan

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 218 // 1:30 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Electronic health records (EHRs) contain patients' medical information. EHRs were created to enhance medical security and efficiency, thus improving the overall quality of healthcare. According to The Commonwealth Fund, the USA and India have had slow adoption rates in practice, leading to consistently poorer ratings of overall healthcare than European countries. An anonymous questionnaire was circulated to healthcare workers, students, and consumers electronically. Results from 454 surveys were received, 389 from USA and 65 from India; 58 physicians, 132 other healthcare workers, 120 students, and 144 consumers. Results show inconsistent knowledge about EHRs among most groups. On a scale of 1-10, nursing students (n=34) scored an average of 5.61 in familiarity, while pre-medical students (n=70) scored 2.77 (p<0.001); nursing students are required to perform clinical charting, while pre-medical students are not. Physicians in India (n=12) scored an average of 6.33 (out of 10) in familiarity while physicians in USA (n=46) scored an average of 8.39 (p<0.001). Most physicians and nurses in the USA enter their own data, while in India most hire others to do this job. Consumers overall were concerned they did not have access or full ownership of their records, making these difficult to retrieve for a second opinion.

Founding Sikhona Rescue Centre: Women and Children’s Empowerment in Kitengela, Kenya (Honors Capstone Project)

Elli Wachtman

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 07 // 3:30 PM

Mentor: Andrew Carlson, History

There are an estimated 52 million orphans in Africa (The Borgen Project, 2019). In Kenya, the vicious cycle of poverty is particularly discriminatory toward girls and women. The Sikhona Rescue Centre is a new United States charitable nonprofit organization, founded by Elli Wachtman, which aims to address the plight of women and children in Kitengela, Kenya through culturally informed research and community collaboration specifically focused on relieving hunger, homelessness, and abuse among women and children. After a study of a diverse collection of international nonprofits as well as researching the most recent strategic approaches to combating global poverty, Elli Wachtman decided that a U.S. based non-profit would be a strong ally with the Sikhona Rescue Centre, an existing cause in Kenya, because it could leverage fund-raising and friend-raising in the United States with real problems in Kenya. Partnering with local Kenyan community leaders, Elli Wachtman has worked diligently and efficiently to raise funds to support safe housing and empowerment programs operated through the Sikhona Rescue Centre in Kenya. Her work serves as an example of intercontinental collaboration and models a unique avenue of activism targeting vulnerable women and children. 


Qualities of Responsive Teaching

Sarah Walsh

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Bradley Conrad, Education

In this presentation, I will use the qualities of perceptive teaching such as open-mindedness, awareness, caring, and authenticity to evaluate the interactions taking place in a classroom which I believe to be representative of low socioeconomic status. This project is to better understand how teachers teach certain groups of students specifically based on socioeconomic status. Additionally, this research will serve as a foundation to later compare classrooms of different socioeconomic statuses. I attended a classroom that represents a low socioeconomic status to observe the interactions between students and the teacher. The observations answer what teachers do; these categories include how teachers personalize the experience, teach the whole person, teach with intention, and develop autonomy. This work benefits all teachers and how to become a more culturally responsive educator based on the students in the classroom. 

The Interpersonal Characteristics of a Clinical Mental Health Counselor Affects the Working Alliance Between the Therapist and the Client, with an Emphasis in Art Therapy

Hunter Weidner

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 102 // 2:00 PM

Mentors: Michaele Barsnack, Art

Current research suggests that interpersonal characteristics of a therapist can affect different aspects of therapy for the client, especially an art therapist (Heynen, Roest, Willemart, van Hooren, 2017). The purpose of this research was to outline and demonstrate these characteristics that can not only affect the working alliance between the client and the therapist, but provide supportive evidence that it has the potential to affect the outcome of therapy for the client. This study was composed of a literature review on the current and relevant information that is provided in academic, peer-reviewed sources. Compiled resources showed that there is a positive correlation between the interpersonal characteristics of a clinical mental health professional affecting the possible outcome of the working alliance between the client and therapist, specifically relating to an art therapist. The compilation of results is important as it illustrates why it is important for a clinical mental health counselor to manage their interpersonal characteristics within a therapeutic setting.


Moving Beyond Critical Thinking: An Analysis of Concept Mapping in Nursing Education (Graduate Research Forum)

Andrea Whitcraft

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kathy Fernandez, Nursing

With pending changes to the national nursing licensure examination to focus on clinical judgement, educators are seeking methods to help students better learn the cognitive processes necessary for entry into practice. One proven method for enhancing critical thinking skills is concept mapping. However, the benefits of this method extend beyond simply critical thinking. This paper seeks to analyze concept mapping not only as a way to enhance critical thinking in nursing students, but also a method to improve overall salience in nursing education. A literature review was conducted using CINHAL to establish the definition and theory of concept mapping, discover the impact of concept mapping on cognitive abilities, and ways to incorporate concept mapping into nursing education. Search terms “concept mapping,” “critical thinking,” “nursing education,” and “clinical judgement” were used. 17 articles were selected based on relevance to the topic with historical articles utilized for context. While concept mapping has been used as a method to improve critical thinking in nursing education, it has the ability to improve overall meta-cognitive skills as well as clinical judgement. These are the skills necessary for nurses to have in place upon entry into clinical practice in today’s current healthcare environment. 

Women’s Voices Through Art: Femicide in Cuidad Juárez

Danielle Whitley

Oral Presentation: Battelle Hall 235 // 2:00 PM

Mentor: Stephanie Saunders, Languages & Cultures

In the last three decades, acts of violence have afflicted parts of Latin America, particularly through disappearances and assassinations of women. These horrendous tragedies, defined by many as femicide, remain a reoccurring issue across the world. One country that has a high femicide rate is Mexico, particularly in Ciudad Juárez, which has been identified as one of the most dangerous cities in the world. Newspapers, magazines, and photos contribute to these injustices by recounting a fallacious storyline regarding the violent acts towards these women by blaming the victims. Contrary to the media, journalists and artists have disclosed authentic stories through interviews with the victims’ families, and commemorative sites that support critical discourse. This study analyzed local Mexican artists’ participation in a national dialogue regarding femicide that has resulted in governmental and community responses. Through the application of gender and body studies, as devised by writers such as Alice Driver and Gloria Anzaldúa, this research reveals the creative interplay of art and memory and its key role in national security and policy.

Hook of the Hamate

Allison Williams

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Hook of the Hamate fractures, while rare, occur in the Hamate bone of the wrist and ultimately results in excision of the fracture fragment and smoothing of the Hamate body surface. Excision is the preferred approach due to the poor blood supply in the area. Following the removal of the Hamate’s hook, patients are immobilized while healing of the incision site occurs. The purpose of this surgery is to remove the Hamate’s hook and prevent damage to the surrounding tendons and Ulnar neurovascular bundle. This Injury is primarily seen in bat or racket sports like Hockey, Tennis, and Baseball. A review of peer-reviewed articles will explain the anatomy of the wrist and involved structures and the surgical process and the rehabilitation phases for patients recovering from excision of the hook of the hamate. Post excision of the hamate hook, immobilization is required and due to this you would likely see a decrease in range of motion and atrophy to the immobilized structures. As a clinician, this surgical procedure is important to know when considering a rehabilitation plan, looking at past medical history, and looking at how it will affect athletic capabilities 

Mental Health in Student Athletes

Allison Williams, Kelsey Kitchel, Alex Lowry, Kasey Wentzel

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentors: Benjamin Pester, Health & Sport Sciences

Mental health is one of the most prominent illness’s facing young people today, but is often overlooked, especially in athletics. Addressing mental health in sports is essential due to the intense physical demands and time commitment required on top of school and social responsibilities. In addition, mental health has copious amounts of stigma attached to it, which can be detrimental to a student athlete’s personal and social wellbeing. Evidence in research papers, articles, and books show the negative and positive effects athletics can have on mental health. These resources will help us inform the athletic community on the issue of mental health in high school athletics. Analyzing and sharing this research and data about mental health opens chains of communication with athletes, parents, coaches, and athletic trainers. Presenters went to Bishop Hartley High School and presented to student athletes on this topic. This information allows athletes to have a greater understanding and acceptance of mental health in athletics. With this shared research we aim to encourage student athletes to seek help when mental health issues arise and inform the community on the effects of mental health on sports. 


Persistent Mislabeling of Sushi Products in Central Ohio and Beyond

Carlie Wilson

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Kerry Cheesman, Biological & Environmental Sciences

Sushi has become progressively popular in many regions, especially the United States. However, there have been inconsistencies in the labeling of fish from sushi sellers. In 2003, the Barcode of Life Initiative (iBOL) began identifying and archiving the DNA makeup and other information about millions of organisms, including fish. In order to assess whether fish used in local sushi is correctly labeled, DNA collected from sushi samples was tested and then compared to the iBOL records to determine the accuracy of what the label claimed to be selling. Samples were labeled with the species name used by the seller and were stored at -80C until analyzed. 100 mg of each tissue were lysed and a 655 base pair region of the mitochondrial cytochrome c oxidase subunit 1 (COI) DNA was eluted using standard methods from Bio-Rad Corp. Extracted DNA was amplified by PCR, then separated using 1.5% gel electrophoresis. Results were compared to known DNA sequences to determine whether merchant labels match the DNA. Preliminary results indicated that 23-33% of samples are mislabeled. The use of DNA barcoding has improved the way in which organisms are identified. This research promotes the expansion and application of DNA barcoding in similar inquiries. 


Misinformation in Media: An In-Depth Analysis of Common Anti-Vaccine Arguments on Facebook

Madison Wood, Brianna Charles, Amina Yerrow

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Nicholas M. Van Horn, Psychology

In 2018, approximately 140,000 people died from measles, about 1.5 times more than in 2016. The rise of anti-vaccine propaganda on social media may contribute to the rise in anti-vaccine behaviors and the resurgence of preventable diseases. The purpose of this study is to identify anti-vaccine arguments. The sample consists of 25 text-based posts from 15 Facebook pages. The specific measures aim to find (1) how the content appeals to emotion, fear, or rationality, (2) whether the content relates to the subject sub-groups of conspiracy, alternatives, trust, and/or safety, and (3) whether the content cites a source. These measures are coded using a numeric scale, with higher scores indicating less reliability/accuracy of each post. It is expected that all of these pages will score highly. The study also includes a survey, with questions examining subjects' perceptions of COVID-19 using the same measures as in the meta-analysis, and will complement the meta-analysis data by determining whether the given measures apply in other contexts. The findings of the meta-analysis, coupled with the data from the survey, can be used to assist in developing factual information and materials to counter anti-vaccine arguments. 

Blurred Lines: Treatment of Victims of DMST in the Legal System

Carly Woolwine

Oral Presentation: Learning Center 105 // 2:30 PM

Mentors: Laura Kane, Sociology & Criminology

The number one most undetected and ignored crime against children, and humanity in general, is sex trafficking through the commercial sex industry which makes $100 billion dollars in revenue each year (Roby & Vincent, 2017). Recently, there has been controversy as to how to aid the victims after they have been caught by the police, as well as inconsistency in rulings and legislation in the courts in dealing with prosecution of offenders and victims. In recent years, more legislation and policy has been passed in order to combat sex trafficking of minors, but across the board, America has not found a consistent way to help the rescued victims of this trauma. The idea of studying this phenomenon is fairly new and there is still a strong social stigma that makes talking about the situation difficult for victims, as can be seen in the research done by Sonal Pandey in India. There is a need for this study in the discipline in order to help promote legislation to protect those who are most vulnerable: the children. This project aims to review policies and practices in place to help the victims by way of new legislation and prevention strategies to end the pandemic.

Genetic Variability and Inbreeding in Gray Fox (Urocyon cinereoargenteus) Populations in Ohio

Emma Young

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Christine Anderson, Biological & Environmental Sciences

The gray fox (Urocyon cinereoargenteus) is one of only two native fox species in Ohio. Unfortunately, gray fox populations have been in severe decline over the past 20 years in Ohio. In this study, it was predicted that genetic variation in gray foxes is low and inbreeding depression would be detectable in Ohio populations. A total of 21 extracted gray fox DNA samples from 10 counties in Ohio were obtained and amplified in multiplex reactions at six different microsatellite loci (GF-04, GF-09, GF-14, GF-B7, CXX 468, and CXX 204) using Qiagen’s Multiplex PCR kit. The products were confirmed on 3% agarose gels and then genotyped at the OSUCCC-James Genomics Shared Resource Facility. Preliminary results showed that observed (HO) and expected heterozygosity (HE) were 0.699 and 0.705, respectively, and the level of inbreeding (FIS) was 0.034 using the program GENEPOP. These preliminary findings suggest that genetic variation is moderate to high and inbreeding is low. Thirty-one more gray fox tissue samples have been collected to be analyzed and amplified. This will provide a better understanding of the status of U. cinereoargenteus populations in Ohio and make it clear if a management plan is necessary to conserve the species. 
Lady Justice: Resources for Women in Law

Abby Young

Poster Presentation: Capital Center Fieldhouse // 11:30 AM - 1:00 PM

Mentor: Dan Heaton, Communication

Women in law are a minority, and it is our job to support these women with the resources that can help them achieve their goals. This project is targeted towards women at Capital and provides them with connections that will help them in their career. I conducted thorough interviews with an abundance of women lawyers across different firms and positions in Columbus to gain crucial information about this necessity. My findings conclude that networking, confidence, and investment in education are the most prominent manners by which a women can go on to find desired employment after law school. Because of inequity in the field, women need more connections, advice, and resources from experienced professionals dealing with the same issues in gender bias so as to provide a full understanding of the difficulties and opportunities that may come upon entrance into the profession. Through this research, I examine the trials of women in the legal field, and to educate others on the necessity for further education in this area.


